Nebraska, session 109, LB677.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 1, Initiative Law 2024, No. 438, is amended to
read:
Section 1. Sections 1 to 6 of this act and sections 1 to 167 of this
act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation
Act, the definitions found in sections 3 to 45 of this act apply.
Sec. 3. Allowable amount of cannabis does not include the weight of
any other ingredient combined with cannabis as part of topical or oral
administrations, food, drink, or other preparations.
Sec. 4. Cancel means to discontinue all rights and privileges of a
license.
Sec. 5. (1) Cannabis means all parts of the plant of the genus
cannabis whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, the resin extracted
from any part of the plant, and every compound, manufacture, salt,
derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or its
resin.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act, cannabis includes cannabis in all forms, including, but
not limited to, cannabis products and concentrated cannabis.
(3) Cannabis does not include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber
produced from such stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant,
the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination, or
cannabidiol contained in a drug product approved by the federal Food and
Drug Administration.
(4) Cannabis does not include hemp as defined in section 2-503.
Sec. 6. Cannabis accessories means any equipment, products, or
materials of any kind that are used, intended for use, or designed for
use in storing, vaporizing, smoking, or containing cannabis, or for
ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing cannabis into the human
body.
-2-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Sec. 7. Cannabis for medical purposes means cannabis and cannabis
accessories intended for use by qualified patients and registered
caregivers pursuant to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act for
the alleviation of a qualifying medical condition.
Sec. 8. Cannabis product means a product comprised of cannabis and
other ingredients. Cannabis product includes, but is not limited to,
cannabis-infused edible products, concentrated cannabis, ointments,
tinctures, and transdermal patches;
Sec. 9. Caregiver means:
(1) In the case of a qualified patient who is eighteen years of age
or older and is not under the protection of a legal guardian, a person
who:
(a) Is at least twenty-one years of age; and
(b) Has been designated by a qualified patient in a signed
affidavit;
(2) In the case of a qualified patient who is younger than eighteen
years of age or a qualified patient under the protection of a legal
guardian:
(a) The legal guardian or a parent with authority to make health
care decisions for the qualified patient; or
(b) A person designated in a sworn affidavit by the legal guardian
or parent with authority to make health care decisions; or
(3) A health care facility or a home health agency, if the facility
or agency has been designated by a qualified patient or the legal
guardian or parent with authority to make health care decisions for a
qualified patient in a sworn affidavit and if the facility or agency has
agreed in writing to serve as a caregiver for the qualified patient.
Sec. 10. Commission means the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission.
Sec. 11. Concentrated cannabis means the resin extracted from any
part of the plant of the genus Cannabis and every compound, manufacture,
salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of that resin. This includes
-3-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
inhalable concentrates which may be comprised of cannabis and other
ingredients inside a device that uses a heating element to create a
vapor, including, but not limited to, vaporizer cartridges and vaporizer
pens.
Sec. 12. Conviction includes a plea or verdict of guilty or a
conviction following a plea of nolo contendere.
Sec. 13. Cultivator means a person licensed by the commission to
cultivate and process cannabis plants pursuant to the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act for sale to dispensaries, to products
manufacturers, and to other cultivators, but not to qualified patients or
registered caregivers.
Sec. 14. Dispensary means a person licensed by the commission to:
(1) Purchase cannabis from cultivators;
(2) Purchase cannabis products from products manufacturers and other
dispensaries; and
(3) Sell cannabis and cannabis products to qualified patients,
registered caregivers, and other dispensaries.
Sec. 15. (1) Disqualifying offense means a felony, of which a
person was convicted in the ten years preceding application for
licensure, that is:
(a) A violent offense;
(b) A violation of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or a
violation of a substantially equivalent law of another jurisdiction in
the United States; or
(c) A violation of subdivision (4)(a)(i) or subsection (5) of
section 28-416 or a violation of a substantially equivalent law of
another jurisdiction in the United States.
(2) An offense is not a disqualifying offense if it has been
pardoned, expunged, or set aside.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) Serious bodily injury has the same meaning as in section 28-109;
-4-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(b) Sexual contact and sexual penetration have the same meanings as
in section 28-318; and
(c) Violent offense means:
(i) A felony violation of any of the following: Section 28-303,
28-304, 28-305, 28-306, 28-308, 28-309, 28-310.01, 28-311, 28-311.01,
28-311.03, 28-311.08, 28-313, 28-314, 28-316.01, 28-319, 28-319.01,
28-320, 28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.02, 28-322.03, 28-322.04, 28-322.05,
28-323, 28-324, 28-386, 28-391, 28-392, 28-393, 28-394, 28-397, 28-398,
28-502, 28-503, 28-507, 28-703, 28-707, 28-813.01, 28-831, 28-833,
28-904, 28-905, 28-912, 28-929, 28-930, 28-931, 28-931.01, 28-932,
28-933, 28-934, 28-1005, 28-1009, 28-1105.01, 28-1205, 28-1212.02,
28-1212.04, 28-1221, 28-1222, 28-1223, 28-1224, 28-1351, 28-1463.03,
28-1463.05, or 42-924;
(ii) An offense which is a Class IIIA felony or higher which
includes, as an element of the offense:
(A) Sexual contact or sexual penetration; or
(B) The threat to inflict serious bodily injury or death on another
person, the infliction of serious bodily injury on another person, or
causing the death of another person;
(iii) Consists of attempt, conspiracy, being an accessory to, or
aiding and abetting a felony with any of the offenses described in
subdivision (3)(c)(i) or (ii) of this section as the underlying offense;
or
(iv) A felony offense that is substantially equivalent to an offense
described in subdivision (3)(c)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section under
the laws of another jurisdiction in the United States.
Sec. 16. Extraction means a process by which cannabinoids are
separated from cannabis plant material through chemical or physical
means.
Sec. 17. Health care facility has the same meaning as in section
71-413.
-5-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Sec. 18. Health care practitioner means a physician, an osteopathic
physician, a physician assistant, or a nurse practitioner licensed under
the Uniform Credentialing Act or who is licensed in any state and
practicing in compliance with the Uniform Credentialing Act.
Sec. 19. Home health agency has the same meaning as in section
71-417.
Sec. 20. License means a license issued by the commission pursuant
to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
Sec. 21. Licensed premises means the premises specified in an
application for a license under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation
Act, which are owned by or in the possession of the licensee and within
which the licensee is authorized to cultivate, process, manufacture,
distribute, transport, sell, or test cannabis in accordance with the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
Sec. 22. Licensee means a person licensed by the commission
pursuant to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
Sec. 23. Local governing body means (1) the city council or village
board of trustees of a city or village within which the licensed premises
are located or (2) if the licensed premises are not within the corporate
limits of a city or village, the county board of the county within which
the licensed premises are located.
Sec. 24. Location means a particular parcel of land that may be
identified by an address or other descriptive means.
Sec. 25. Manager means a person appointed by a corporation or
limited liability company to oversee the daily operation of a licensee in
Nebraska. A manager shall meet all the requirements of the Nebraska
Medical Cannabis Regulation Act as though such person were the applicant.
Sec. 26. Ordinance means any ordinance, regulation, resolution, or
other law duly enacted by a local governing body.
Sec. 27. Premises means a distinctly identified and definite
location, as required by the commission, and may include a building, a
-6-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
part of a building, a room, or any other definite contiguous area.
Sec. 28. Process or processing means to harvest, dry, cure, trim,
and separate parts of the cannabis plant by manual or mechanical means.
Sec. 29. Products manufacturer means a person licensed by the
commission to conduct extraction and to manufacture cannabis products
pursuant to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act for sale and
distribution to dispensaries and other products manufacturers, but not to
qualified patients or registered caregivers.
Sec. 30. Qualified patient means an individual who:
(1) Has been diagnosed with a qualifying medical condition;
(2) Has a written recommendation from a health care practitioner;
(3) In the case of an individual younger than eighteen years of age,
has the written permission of a legal guardian or parent with authority
to make health care decisions for the individual;
(4) In the case of an individual eighteen years of age or older who
is under the protection of a legal guardian, has the written permission
of such guardian; and
(5) Is enrolled in the registry program by the commission.
Sec. 31. Qualifying medical condition means a condition for which a
patient's health care practitioner has determined, in a written
recommendation, that such condition, related symptoms, or side effects of
the condition's treatment, can be appropriately treated or alleviated
with medical cannabis.
Sec. 32. Registered caregiver means a caregiver who is enrolled in
the registry program.
Sec. 33. Registry card means a document issued by the commission
pursuant to section 55 of this act that identifies a person as a
qualified patient or registered caregiver.
Sec. 34. Registry program means the registry of qualified patients
and caregivers operated by the commission under section 51 of this act.
Sec. 35. Responsible individual means:
-7-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(1) A chief executive officer or chief operating officer of a health
care facility or a home health agency; or
(2) An administrator, a director, or another individual designated
by a health care facility or a home health agency pursuant to rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission.
Sec. 36. Revoke means to permanently void and recall all rights and
privileges of a license.
Sec. 37. Seed-to-sale tracking system means a software system that:
(1) Is designed to perform functions necessary to fulfill a
licensee's responsibilities in tracking cannabis from either the seed or
immature plant stage until the cannabis is sold to a qualified patient or
registered caregiver or otherwise disposed of;
(2) Meets the requirements of section 135 of this act; and
(3) Is approved by the commission.
Sec. 38. Suspend means to cause a temporary interruption of all
rights and privileges of a license.
Sec. 39. Testing facility means a person licensed under the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act to analyze, test, and certify
cannabis, including for potency and the presence of contaminants.
Sec. 40. THC means tetrahydrocannabinol.
Sec. 41. Track and trace system means the system created by the
commission under section 135 of this act.
Sec. 42. Transfer means to grant, convey, hand over, assign, sell,
exchange, or barter, in any manner or by any means, with or without
consideration.
Sec. 43. Transporter means a person licensed by the commission to
transport cannabis and cannabis accessories.
Sec. 44. Unreasonably impracticable means that the measures
necessary to comply with the rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated pursuant to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or
the ordinances enacted by a local governing body pursuant to the act
-8-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
would subject a licensee to unreasonable risk or require such a large
investment of risk, money, time, or any other resource or asset that a
reasonably prudent businessperson would not operate as a licensee.
Sec. 45. Written recommendation means a valid signed and dated
declaration from a health care practitioner that complies with section 50
of this act.
Sec. 46. (1) Subject to the requirements of the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act, a qualified patient or registered caregiver
shall not be subject to citation, arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any
manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to,
any civil penalty or disciplinary action by a court or occupational or
professional licensing board, for engaging in conduct protected by this
section.
(2) A qualified patient may use, possess, and acquire an allowable
amount of cannabis and cannabis accessories for the alleviation of a
qualifying medical condition.
(3) A registered caregiver may assist a qualified patient with the
activities set forth in subsection (2) of this section by possessing and
acquiring an allowable amount of cannabis and cannabis accessories on
behalf of the qualified patient, delivering an allowable amount of
cannabis and cannabis accessories to the qualified patient, and providing
assistance in administering or consuming such cannabis.
(4) There is a presumption that a qualified patient or registered
caregiver is engaged in conduct protected by the act if the person
possesses an amount of cannabis that does not exceed the allowable
amount. The presumption may be rebutted by evidence that conduct relating
to cannabis was not for the purpose of treating or alleviating a
qualified patient's qualifying medical condition.
(5) If a qualified patient or registered caregiver is cited,
arrested, or prosecuted for possession or consumption of an allowable
amount of cannabis pursuant to the act at a time when the person does not
-9-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
have the registry card in his or her possession, the prosecution, civil
offense, or disciplinary proceeding shall be immediately dismissed upon
production and verification of the registry card.
(6) Conduct protected by the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation
Act shall not be subject to the Uniform Controlled Substances Act.
Sec. 47. No person may be subject to arrest, prosecution, or
penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including any
civil penalty or disciplinary action by a court or occupational or
professional licensing board, for:
(1) Being in the presence or vicinity of the use or possession of
cannabis that is permitted under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation
Act; or
(2) Allowing the person's property to be used for activities that
are permitted under the act.
Sec. 48. (1) Nothing in the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation
Act permits any person to engage in or prevents the imposition of any
civil, criminal, or other penalties for:
(a) Undertaking any task that would constitute negligence or
professional malpractice due to the use of cannabis;
(b) Possessing or engaging in the use of cannabis:
(i) On a school bus or van;
(ii) On the grounds of any preschool or primary or secondary school
except as provided in section 49 of this act;
(iii) In any jail, adult or juvenile correctional facility, or youth
rehabilitation and treatment center; or
(iv) On the grounds of any child care facility or home day care
except as provided in section 49 of this act;
(c) Smoking cannabis or inhaling cannabis by means of vaporization:
(i) Where the smoke or vapor would be inhaled by a nonpatient minor
child; or
(ii) In any public place, including any indoor or outdoor area used
-10-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
by or open to the general public or a place of employment as defined in
section 71-5724, other than with an aerosol inhaler;
(d) Inhaling or consuming cannabis in a motor vehicle;
(e) Having a container or package of cannabis within the passenger
area of a motor vehicle in violation of section 60-6,211.08; or
(f) Operating, navigating, or being in actual physical control of
any motor vehicle, aircraft, train, or motorboat, or working on
transportation property, equipment, or facilities, while under the
influence of cannabis.
(2) Nothing in the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act:
(a) Requires an employer to permit or accommodate the growing,
possession, consumption, use, distribution, display, transfer,
transportation, or sale of cannabis;
(b) Affects the ability of an employer to restrict the use of
cannabis by employees;
(c) Requires any employer to accommodate the use of cannabis; or
(d) Requires the medical assistance program or any employer or
insurance carrier pursuant to the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act to
reimburse a person for costs associated with the medicinal use of
cannabis.
(3) Nothing in the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act shall be
construed to:
(a) Prohibit an employer from including in any contract a provision
prohibiting the use of cannabis;
(b) Permit a cause of action against an employer for wrongful
discharge or discrimination;
(c) Prohibit a person, an employer, a corporation, or any other
entity which occupies, owns, or controls property from prohibiting or
otherwise regulating the growing, possession, consumption, use,
distribution, display, transfer, transportation, or sale of cannabis, on
or in that property; or
-11-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(d) Prohibit an employer from establishing and enforcing a drug-
testing policy, drug-free workplace policy, or zero-tolerance drug
policy.
(4) An employee who is discharged from employment for misconduct
relating to (a) the consumption or use of cannabis, (b) working while
under the influence of cannabis, or (c) testing positive for a controlled
substance shall be disqualified from receiving benefits under the
Employment Security Law as provided in section 48-628.10.
Sec. 49. (1) Any school, health care facility or health care
service licensed pursuant to the Health Care Facility Licensure Act,
licensed child care facility as defined in section 43-4308, or foster
care facility as defined in section 43-1301 may adopt reasonable
restrictions on the use of cannabis by students, residents, or persons
receiving care or services, including that:
(a) The school, facility, or service and agents thereof are not
responsible for providing the cannabis;
(b) Cannabis may not be smoked;
(c) Cannabis may not be inhaled using vaporization, except that this
shall not prohibit the use of an aerosol inhaler; and
(d) Cannabis may be consumed only in a place specified by the
school, facility, or service.
(2) Nothing in this section requires a school, facility, or service
listed in subsection (1) of this section to adopt restrictions on the
medicinal use of cannabis.
(3) A school, facility, or service listed in subsection (1) of this
section shall not unreasonably limit a patient's access to or use of
cannabis authorized under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or
the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act unless failing to do
so would cause the school, facility, or service to lose a monetary or
license-related benefit under federal law or regulations.
Sec. 50. (1) Before an individual may enroll in the registry
-12-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
program as a qualified patient, the individual shall receive a written
recommendation from a health care practitioner as provided in this
section.
(2) A health care practitioner may issue a written recommendation to
an individual if the practitioner determines that:
(a) Either:
(i) The individual is eighteen years of age or older and does not
have a legal guardian;
(ii) If the individual is younger than eighteen years of age, the
individual has the written permission of a legal guardian or parent with
authority to make health care decisions for the individual; or
(iii) If the individual is eighteen years of age or older and has a
legal guardian, the individual has the written permission of such
guardian;
(b) The individual has been diagnosed with a qualifying medical
condition; and
(c) In the practitioner's professional judgment, the potential
benefits of cannabis outweigh the potential harms for the alleviation of
the individual's qualifying medical condition.
(3) A written recommendation shall be signed and dated by the health
care practitioner and shall include the practitioner's mailing address,
telephone number, and email address.
Sec. 51. (1) The commission shall establish and maintain a registry
program for qualified patients and registered caregiver. The registry
shall include (a) the name, address, and telephone number of each
qualified patient and registered caregiver, (b) the health care
practitioner that provided the written recommendation for the patient,
and (c) the registered caregiver for the qualified patient, if any.
(2) The commission shall ensure that information in the registry
program, as well as from applications under sections 52 and 53 of this
act, is kept confidential to protect the privacy of applicants and people
-13-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
enrolled in the registry.
Sec. 52. (1) An individual may apply to the commission to be
enrolled in the registry program as a qualified patient by submitting an
application to the commission in the form and manner prescribed by the
commission. The application shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount
determined by the commission, not to exceed forty-five dollars.
(2) An application under this section shall include the following:
(a) The name, mailing address, and date of birth of the individual;
(b) If applicable, the name, mailing address, and date of birth of
the individual's registered caregiver or person seeking such
registration;
(c) If the individual is younger than eighteen years of age:
(i) Written permission from the individual's legal guardian or
parent with authority to make health care decisions for the individual;
and
(ii) The name, mailing address, and date of birth of such guardian
or parent;
(d) If the individual is eighteen years of age or older and has a
legal guardian:
(i) Written permission of such guardian; and
(ii) The name, mailing address, and date of birth of such guardian;
(e) A copy of a written recommendation dated less than sixty days
before the date the application is submitted;
(f) If the individual requests more than one registered caregiver at
any given time, documentation demonstrating that a greater number of
caregivers is needed due to the individual's age or medical condition;
(g) An oath, affirmation, or statement to the effect that the
representations are true as far as the individual executing the
application knows or should know; and
(h) Any other information as prescribed by the rules and regulations
of the commission.
-14-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(3) Enrollment in the registry program as a qualified patient shall
be valid for a period of two years. A qualified patient may renew such
registration by submitting a renewal application in a form and manner
prescribed by the commission within ninety days before the registration
will expire. The application shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount
determined by the commission, not to exceed forty-five dollars, and by a
written recommendation dated within ninety days preceding the date the
application is submitted.
Sec. 53. (1) A person may apply to the commission to be enrolled in
the registry program as a registered caregiver by submitting an
application to the commission in the form and manner prescribed by the
commission.
(2) An application under this section shall include the following:
(a)(i) If the applicant is an individual, the name, mailing address,
and date of birth of the individual; or
(ii) If the applicant is a health care facility or a home health
agency:
(A) The name and mailing address of the facility or agency; and
(B) The name, residential mailing address, and date of birth of the
designated responsible individual;
(b) The name, mailing address, and date of birth of any qualified
patient for whom the person will serve as a registered caregiver;
(c) An oath, affirmation, or statement to the effect that its
representations are true as far as the individual executing the
application knows or should know; and
(d) Any other information as prescribed by the rules and regulations
of the commission.
Sec. 54. (1) Within thirty days after receipt of an application for
initial enrollment or renewal of enrollment in the registry under section
52 or 53 of this act, the commission shall either enroll the person as a
qualified patient or registered caregiver, renew such enrollment, or give
-15-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
written notice of denial.
(2) An application shall only be denied if:
(a) The application fails to include the information and materials
required by section 52 or 53 of this act; or
(b) The applicant knowingly makes a false statement of material fact
in the application.
(3) If the application is denied, the notice of denial shall state
the reason enrollment or re-enrollment was denied.
(4) A denial under this section may be appealed. The appeal shall be
in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 55. (1) Upon granting an application under section 54 of this
act, the commission shall issue the qualified patient or registered
caregiver a registry card or renew such card.
(2) A registry card for a qualified patient shall include:
(a) The patient's name and date of birth;
(b) The name, mailing address, and date of birth of the patient's
registered caregiver, if any; and
(c) The date the registration will expire.
(3) A registry card for a registered caregiver shall include:
(a) The caregiver's name and date of birth, if applicable;
(b) The name and date of birth of any qualified patient the
caregiver is authorized to serve; and
(c) The allowable amount of cannabis the caregiver may possess,
separately listed for each qualified patient.
(4)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (4)(b) of this section, an
individual who is a qualified patient may also serve as a registered
caregiver for other qualified patients. In such case, the individual
shall submit separate applications under sections 52 and 53 of this act
and obtain separate qualified patient and registered caregiver registry
cards.
(b) An individual who is a qualified patient and who has a
-16-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
registered caregiver shall not serve as a registered caregiver for other
qualified patients.
Sec. 56. A registered caregiver may possess cannabis, cannabis
products, and cannabis accessories on behalf of one or more qualified
patients served by the registered caregiver. The registered caregiver may
possess a separate allowable amount of cannabis for each such patient,
including the registered caregiver, if the registered caregiver is also a
qualified patient. The caregiver shall separately label and store
cannabis, cannabis products, and cannabis accessories for each such
patient.
Sec. 57. (1) If a qualified patient or registered caregiver is no
longer entitled to possess cannabis under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act, the qualified patient or registered caregiver shall,
within ten days after becoming ineligible:
(a) Notify the commission and surrender his or her registry card to
the commission. Such notification and surrender shall be done in a form
and manner prescribed by the commission; and
(b) Destroy any cannabis in compliance with rules and regulations of
the commission or turn it over to a dispensary for disposal.
(2)(a) If a qualified patient dies, any cannabis that had been in
the patient's possession shall, within thirty days after such death, be
destroyed in compliance with rules and regulations of the commission or
turned over to a dispensary for disposal.
(b) If a registered caregiver dies, any cannabis that had been in
the caregiver's possession shall, within thirty days after such death:
(i) Be turned over to the qualified patient, if the patient may
possess such cannabis;
(ii) Be turned over to another registered caregiver for the same
qualified patient; or
(iii) Be destroyed in compliance with rules and regulations of the
commission or turned over to a dispensary for disposal.
-17-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(3) A person transporting cannabis to a dispensary for disposal
under this section shall contact the commission, and the commission shall
coordinate delivery arrangements between such person and the dispensary.
The commission will provide the individual with a written, temporary
authorization to transport such cannabis, which will include details
regarding the delivery arrangements approved by the commission.
Sec. 58. If cannabis belonging to a qualified patient or registered
caregiver is stolen or lost, the qualified patient or registered
caregiver shall notify the commission within five days after learning of
such theft or loss.
Sec. 59. A health care practitioner that issues written
recommendations shall not:
(1) Accept, solicit, or offer any form of pecuniary remuneration
from or to any entity licensed under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act;
(2) Offer a discount or any other thing of value to a qualified
patient who uses or agrees to use a particular dispensary;
(3) Examine a patient at a location where cannabis, cannabis
products, or cannabis accessories are sold; or
(4) Hold an economic interest in any entity licensed under the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
Sec. 60. A health care practitioner shall not be subject to arrest,
prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege,
including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by
the Department of Health and Human Services or by any other occupational
or professional licensing board, solely for providing a written
recommendation or for stating that, in the health care practitioner's
professional opinion, a patient is likely to receive therapeutic or
palliative benefit from use of cannabis to treat or alleviate the
patient's qualifying medical condition.
Sec. 61. The governing body of a county, city, or village shall not
-18-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
prohibit the delivery of cannabis, cannabis products, or cannabis
accessories for use under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act
either expressly or through the enactment of ordinances or regulations
that make the delivery impracticable in the respective jurisdiction.
Sec. 62. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations governing entities that serve as registered caregivers as
provided in subsection (3) of section 9 of this act, including:
(1) Limiting the number of individuals who may transport and
administer cannabis on behalf of the entity to a reasonably necessary
number of individuals who have undergone appropriate training; and
(2) Requiring the name and date of birth of each individual who may
transport or administer cannabis on behalf of the entity to be filed with
the commission.
Sec. 63. Section 4, Initiative Law 2024, No. 438, is amended to
read:
Sec. 4. (1) For purposes of providing the necessary licensure
registration and regulation of persons that possess, cultivate, process,
manufacture, distribute, transport, sell, and test deliver, and dispense
cannabis for medical purposes pursuant to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act, the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission is created.
(2) The commission shall consist of no fewer than three and no more
than five members.
(3) The three members of the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission
shall be ex officio members of the commission, serving terms and
receiving appointment in the same manner as provided in section 53-105.
(4) The Governor may appoint two additional members, subject to
confirmation by a majority of the members elected to the Legislature, to
serve with the members of the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission as
members of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission. The members
appointed pursuant to this subsection shall serve six-year terms.
(5) The Governor may reappoint members of the commission, subject to
-19-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
approval by a majority of the members elected to the Legislature.
Sec. 64. Section 5, Initiative Law 2024, No. 438, is amended to
read:
Sec. 5. The power to regulate all phases of the control of the
possession, cultivation, processing, manufacture, distribution,
transportation, selling, and testing delivery, and dispensing of cannabis
for medical purposes by licensees registered cannabis establishments in
the state pursuant to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act is
vested exclusively in the commission.
Sec. 65. A majority of the members of the commission shall
constitute a quorum to transact business, but no vacancy shall impair the
right of the remaining commissioners to exercise all of the powers of the
commission. Every act of a majority of the commissioners shall be deemed
to be the act of the commission.
Sec. 66. (1) The commission shall have an executive director, to be
appointed by the commission. The executive director of the Nebraska
Liquor Control Commission may also serve as the executive director of the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission, or the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Commission may appoint a separate individual to serve as its executive
director. If the commission appoints a separate individual, such
appointment shall be subject to the approval of the Governor.
(2) The salary of the executive director shall be fixed by the
commission and payable monthly.
(3) The executive director shall keep a record of all proceedings,
transactions, communications, and official acts of the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Commission. The executive director shall be the custodian of all
records and perform such other duties as the commission may prescribe.
Sec. 67. Before entering upon the duties of office, each
commissioner and the executive director shall be bonded or insured as
required by section 11-201. The premium shall be paid by the State of
Nebraska out of the General Fund.
-20-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Sec. 68. (1) The commission may, with the advice and approval of
the Governor, appoint or employ such clerks and other employees as may be
necessary to carry out the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or to
perform the duties and exercise the powers conferred by law upon the
commission.
(2) Employees of the commission who are accountable for public funds
shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201 to secure the
safety of such funds. The premium shall be paid by the State of Nebraska
out of the General Fund.
Sec. 69. The commissioners, the executive director of the
commission, and all employees of the commission shall be reimbursed for
expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties as provided
in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The commission may also incur necessary
expenses for office furniture and other incidental expenses. No
commissioner, executive director, or employee of the commission shall
request or be allowed mileage or other traveling expenses unless such
sections are strictly complied with.
Sec. 70. (1) The office of the commission shall be in Lincoln, but
the commission may, with the approval of the Governor, establish and
maintain branch offices at places other than the seat of government.
(2) The commission shall hold regular meetings at least once a month
and may hold such special meetings as it deems necessary at any time and
at any place within the state.
(3) The commission may, for authentication of its records, process,
and proceedings, adopt, keep, and use a common seal, of which seal
judicial notice shall be taken in all of the courts of the state. Any
process, notice, or other paper which the commission is authorized by law
to issue shall be deemed sufficient if signed by the chairperson and
executive director of the commission and authenticated by such seal. All
acts, orders, proceedings, rules, regulations, entries, minutes, and
other records of the commission and all reports and documents filed with
-21-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
the commission may be proved in any court of this state by copy thereof
certified to by the executive director attached.
Sec. 71. The Attorney General shall designate an assistant attorney
general or assistant attorneys general, when requested by the commission
and directed by the Governor, and the services of such assistant attorney
general or assistant attorneys general shall be available to the
commission whenever demanded. The compensation of such assistant attorney
general or assistant attorneys general as are assigned to the commission
shall be paid by the office of the Attorney General.
Sec. 72. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section, a commissioner, the executive director, or any employee of the
commission shall not:
(a) Directly or indirectly, individually, as a member of a
partnership, as a member of a limited liability company, or as a
shareholder of a corporation, have any interest whatsoever in the
cultivation, processing, manufacture, distribution, transportation,
testing, or sale of cannabis or hemp; or
(b) Receive any compensation or profit from an activity described in
subdivision (1)(a) of this section or have any interest whatsoever in the
purchases or sales made by the persons authorized by the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act to purchase or sell cannabis.
(2) With the written approval of the executive director, an employee
of the commission, other than the executive director or a division
manager, may accept part-time or seasonal employment with a licensee.
(3) This section shall not prevent any commissioner, the executive
director, or any employee from engaging in any conduct as a qualified
patient or registered caregiver that is protected under the Nebraska
Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient
Protection Act.
Sec. 73. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of section 72 of
this act, a commissioner, the executive director, or any person employed
-22-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
by the commission shall not:
(a) Solicit or accept any gift, gratuity, emolument, or employment
from any person subject to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act
or from any officer, agent, or employee of such person; or
(b) Solicit, request from, or recommend, directly or indirectly, to
any person subject to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or to
any officer, agent, or employee of such person the appointment of any
person to any place or position.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (2) of section 72 of this act,
any person subject to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act and
every officer, agent, or employee of such person shall not offer to any
commissioner, the executive director, or any person employed by the
commission any gift, gratuity, emolument, or employment.
(3) If a commissioner, the executive director, or any person
employed by the commission violates this section, such person shall be
removed from such office or employment.
(4) A violation of this section is a Class II misdemeanor.
Sec. 74. (1) A commissioner, the executive director, or a
commission employee with regulatory oversight responsibilities for
licensees shall not work for, represent, or provide consulting services
to or otherwise derive pecuniary gain from a licensee or other business
entity established for the primary purpose of providing services to the
medical cannabis industry for a period of six months following such
person's last day of service to, or employment with, the commission.
(2) A violation of this section is a Class II misdemeanor.
Sec. 75. On or before January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
commission shall publish a report of its actions during the preceding
year, including a comprehensive description of its activities and
including the number of licensees of each class issued; enforcement
actions in which fines, suspensions, revocations, or other disciplinary
sanctions were issued; and a statement of revenue and expenses of the
-23-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
commission.
Sec. 76. The commission and the Department of Agriculture,
Department of Revenue, and Department of Health and Human Services shall
work collaboratively in furtherance of the intent of the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act and to ensure that the cultivation, processing,
manufacture, distribution, transportation, testing, and sale of cannabis
in this state is conducted in accordance with the act.
Sec. 77. (1) On or before October 1, 2025, the commission shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the proper
regulation and control of the cultivation, processing, manufacture,
distribution, transportation, sale, and testing of cannabis and for the
enforcement of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act. Such rules
and regulations shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Procedures and requirements for the issuance and renewal of
licenses, payment of fees, investigating and deciding disciplinary
proceedings, and imposing sanctions for violations of the Nebraska
Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated thereunder;
(b) Qualifications and procedures for licensure under the Nebraska
Medical Cannabis Regulation Act;
(c) Requirements and procedures for testing cannabis for potency and
the presence of contaminants and to otherwise ensure the safety of
qualified patients;
(d) Rules relating to acceptable testing and research practices,
including, but not limited to, research methods, standards, quality
control analysis, equipment certification and calibration, and chemical
identification;
(e) Specifications of duties of officers and employees of the
commission;
(f) Instructions for local governing bodies and law enforcement
officers;
-24-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(g) Requirements for inspections, investigations, searches,
seizures, forfeitures, and such additional enforcement activities as may
become necessary from time to time;
(h) Documentation for identifying licensees and their owners,
officers, managers, and employees;
(i) A schedule of penalties for violations and procedures for
issuing and appealing citations for violations of statutes and rules and
issuing administrative citations;
(j) Requirements for the security of licensed premises, including,
at a minimum, lighting, physical security, video, and alarm requirements,
and other minimum procedures for internal control as deemed necessary by
the commission to properly administer and enforce the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act, including reporting requirements for changes,
alterations, or modifications to the licensed premises. Such requirements
shall not prohibit the cultivation of cannabis outdoors or in
greenhouses;
(k) Regulations on the storage of, warehouses for, and
transportation of cannabis;
(l) Regulations concerning the statewide track and trace system and
seed-to-sale tracking system as provided in section 135 of this act;
(m) Rules regarding the records to be kept by licensees to ensure
that licensees keep complete and accurate electronic records for all
transactions involving cannabis, including, but not limited to, rules
regarding the types of records each licensee shall maintain, retention
schedules, the required availability of the records, and inspection
procedures;
(n) Rules concerning disposal of cannabis by licensees, qualified
patients, registered caregivers, and others as deemed necessary or
appropriate by the commission;
(o) Rules concerning limited access areas as defined in section 128
of this act;
-25-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(p) Health and safety regulations and standards for the manufacture
of cannabis products and cultivation of cannabis;
(q) Sanitary requirements for dispensaries;
(r) Limitations on the display of cannabis in dispensaries;
(s) Rules for transporters, including, but not limited to, insurance
requirements; acceptable timeframes for transport, storage, and delivery;
and requirements for transport vehicles; and
(t) Such other matters as are necessary for the fair, impartial,
stringent, and comprehensive administration of the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act.
(2) On and after October 1, 2025, the commission may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Nebraska
Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
Sec. 78. The commission may develop such forms, applications, and
other documentation as are necessary or convenient in the discretion of
the commission for the administration of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
thereunder.
Sec. 79. Nothing in the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act
shall be construed as delegating to the commission the power to fix
prices for cannabis.
Sec. 80. Rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to
the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act and any ordinance enacted by
a local governing body shall not:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of section 100 of this act,
make it unreasonably impracticable to operate as a licensee;
(2) Require testing of cannabis before the commission has licensed
any testing facilities or, if such facilities have been licensed, before
such facilities are capable of performing any required tests in a timely
manner;
(3) Require a qualified patient or registered caregiver to provide a
-26-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
dispensary with documentation or identifying information other than a
registry card;
(4) Require a dispensary to acquire or record personal information
about qualified patients or registered caregivers other than information
typically required in a retail transaction; or
(5) Prohibit cultivation of cannabis using inorganic cultivation
methods.
Sec. 81. (1) The commission shall provide without charge to any
licensee a copy of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, any
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder, and any other
information which the commission deems important in the area of cannabis
control in the State of Nebraska.
(2) The information may be printed in a booklet, a pamphlet, or any
other form the commission may determine to be appropriate.
(3) The commission may update such material as often as it deems
necessary.
(4) The commission may provide such material to any other person
upon request and may charge a fee for the material. The fee shall be
reasonable and shall not exceed any reasonable or necessary costs of
producing the material for distribution.
Sec. 82. The commission may:
(1) Call upon other departments of the state, political
subdivisions, law enforcement agencies, and prosecutors for such
information and assistance as the commission deems necessary in the
performance of its duties; and
(2) Recommend ordinances to local governing bodies not inconsistent
with the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
Sec. 83. The commission may request the State Fire Marshal to
inspect any licensed premises or premises for which a license is sought
for fire safety pursuant to section 81-502. The State Fire Marshal shall
assess a fee for such inspection pursuant to section 81-505.01 payable by
-27-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
such licensee or applicant. The State Fire Marshal may delegate the
authority to make such inspections to qualified local fire prevention
personnel pursuant to section 81-502.
Sec. 84. (1) The commission shall maintain the confidentiality of
reports or other information obtained from a licensee:
(a) Containing any individualized data, information, or records
related to the licensee or its operation, including sales information,
financial records, tax returns, credit reports, cultivation information,
testing results, or security information and plans;
(b) Which reveals any qualified patient or registered caregiver
information; or
(c) Which are otherwise made confidential or exempt from public
disclosure pursuant to state or federal law.
(2) Confidential information and reports shall only be used for
purposes authorized by the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or
for any other state or local law enforcement purpose. Any qualified
patient or registered caregiver information shall only be used for
purposes authorized by the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or
the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act.
(3) A person who discloses confidential records or information in
violation of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act shall be guilty
of a Class II misdemeanor.
Sec. 85. (1) The Medical Cannabis Control Fund is created. The fund
shall consist of all fees, gifts, grants, and other money, excluding
fines and civil penalties, received or collected by the commission under
the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
(2) The commission shall use the fund for the administration and
enforcement of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act. The fund may
be used to cover any such administrative or enforcement costs, including,
but not limited to, salary and benefits; expenses incurred by the
commission in producing or distributing the forms, materials, and other
-28-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
documentation required by the act; costs of equipment needed to enforce
the act; and costs associated with electronic regulatory transactions,
industry education events, and enforcement training.
(3) Transfers may be made from the Medical Cannabis Control Fund to
the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
(4) Any money in the Medical Cannabis Control Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 86. Section 3, Initiative Law 2024, No. 438, is amended to
read:
Sec. 3. (1) Subject to the requirements of the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act, it shall not be an offense under state law for a
licensee registered cannabis establishment, its employees, and its agents
to possess, cultivate, process, manufacture, distribute, transport, sell,
and test deliver, and dispense cannabis for medical purposes, provided
such conduct complies with applicable rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the commission pursuant to the act Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act.
(2) Conduct protected by the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation
Act this section shall not be subject to the Uniform Controlled
Substances Act.
Sec. 87. An attorney shall not be subject to disciplinary action
for providing legal assistance to a prospective licensee, licensee, or
another person or entity who is engaged in lawful activities pursuant to
the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
Sec. 88. A contract entered into by a licensee or its employees or
agents, or by those who allow their property to be used by a licensee or
its employees or agents, shall not be unenforceable on the basis that
possessing, cultivating, processing, manufacturing, distributing,
dispensing, testing, transporting, selling, or using cannabis is
-29-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
prohibited by federal law. It is the public policy of the State of
Nebraska that such contracts shall be enforceable to the same extent as
other contracts.
Sec. 89. (1) A financial institution may loan money to, accept
deposits from, and otherwise do business with any licensee to the same
extent as other persons, subject to any restrictions of the Nebraska
Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
(2) For purposes of this section, financial institution means a
bank, savings bank, credit card bank, savings and loan association,
building and loan association, trust company, or credit union organized
under the laws of any state or organized under the laws of the United
States.
Sec. 90. There shall be the following classes of licenses under the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act:
(1) Cultivator;
(2) Dispensary;
(3) Products manufacturer;
(4) Testing facility;
(5) Transporter; and
(6) Vertical license.
Sec. 91. (1) The commission may issue a vertical license that
authorizes the licensee to operate an integrated medical cannabis
business. Each vertical license shall allow the licensee to operate:
(a) Four dispensary licenses, with no more than two per
congressional district;
(b) One products manufacturer license; and
(c) One cultivation license.
(2) Until January 1, 2030, the commission shall not issue more than
five vertical licenses statewide.
(3) In addition to any dispensary, products manufacturer, and
cultivation licenses issued as part of a vertical license, until January
-30-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
1, 2030, the commission may issue the following licenses, subject to the
following limits:
(a) Ten dispensary licenses;
(b) Five cultivator licenses;
(c) Five product manufacturer licenses; and
(d) Five testing facility licenses.
(4) The commission may issue transporter licenses, and there shall
be no limit on the number of such licenses issued.
(5) An applicant for a vertical license shall only be required to
pay a single licensing fee under section 95 of this act. However, each
sublicense shall be separately subject to discipline and shall be subject
to the approval and issuance process and local oversight provided in
sections 90 to 113 of this act.
Sec. 92. (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, a person may apply for a
license under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act. An
application for issuance or renewal of a license shall be:
(a) In the form and manner required by the commission;
(b) Accompanied by the fee required by section 95 of this act; and
(c) Verified by oath or affirmation of the persons prescribed by the
commission.
(2) An application for issuance or renewal of a license shall
include:
(a) The name and address of the applicant and how long the applicant
has resided in Nebraska;
(b) The names and addresses of the applicant's officers, directors,
or managers;
(c) The particular premises for which a license is desired,
designating the premises by street and number, if practicable, or by such
other description as definitively locates the premises;
(d) The name of the owner of the premises upon which the business
licensed is to be operated;
-31-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(e) A statement that:
(i) If the application is submitted before January 1, 2030, the
applicant satisfies the residency requirements of section 93 of this act;
and
(ii) The applicant is not disqualified under section 94 of this act;
(f) A statement that the applicant intends to operate the business
authorized by the license on the applicant's own behalf and not as the
agent of any other person and that if licensed the applicant will operate
such business on the applicant's own behalf and not as the agent for any
other person;
(g) A statement that the applicant intends to superintend in person
the management of the business licensed and that, if so licensed, the
applicant will superintend in person the management of the business; and
(h) Such other information as the commission may from time to time
direct.
(3)(a) An applicant for initial issuance shall also submit two
legible sets of fingerprints to be furnished to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation through the Nebraska State Patrol for a national criminal
history record check and the fee for such record check payable to the
patrol. The applicant shall authorize release of the national criminal
history record check to the commission.
(b) The commission may require an applicant for renewal to comply
with subdivision (3)(a) of this section when there is a demonstrated
investigative need.
(4)(a) An application for issuance of a license shall be accompanied
by plans and specifications for the interior of any building on the
licensed premises, if the building to be occupied is in existence at the
time of the application. If such building is yet to be constructed, the
applicant shall file a plot plan and a detailed sketch for the interior
and submit an architect's drawing of the building to be constructed.
(b) The commission shall not issue or renew a license until it is
-32-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
established that the applicant is, or will be, entitled to possession of
the premises for which application is made under a lease, rental
agreement, or other arrangement for possession of the premises or by
virtue of ownership of the premises.
(5) If any false statement is made in any part of an application,
the applicant shall be deemed guilty of perjury, and upon conviction
thereof the license shall be denied or revoked and the applicant
subjected to the penalties set forth in section 28-915.
Sec. 93. Until January 1, 2030:
(1) The commission shall not issue or renew a license unless at
least fifty-one percent of the ownership of the applicant is comprised of
natural persons who have been residents of Nebraska for at least two
years; and
(2) It shall be unlawful to operate as a licensee unless at least
fifty-one percent of the ownership of the licensee is comprised of
natural persons who have been residents of Nebraska for at least two
years.
Sec. 94. A license provided by the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act shall not be issued to or held by:
(1) Any person who has been convicted of a disqualifying offense
within the preceding ten years;
(2) A person if any of its officers, directors, stockholders, or
owners have been convicted of a disqualifying offense within the
preceding ten years;
(3) A person financed in whole or in part by any other person who
has been convicted of a disqualifying offense within the preceding ten
years;
(4) A person under eighteen years of age;
(5) A licensee or former licensee who, during a period of licensure
or at the time of application, has failed to:
(a) File any tax return related to a licensee; or
-33-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(b) Pay any taxes, interest, or penalties due, as determined by
final agency action, relating to a licensee;
(6) Any state, county, municipality, or other political subdivision,
any branch, department, agency, or subdivision of any of the foregoing,
and any corporation or other entity established by law to carry out any
governmental function;
(7) A peace officer, an employee of a jail or the Department of
Correctional Services, or an official or employee of a local governing
body;
(8) A health care practitioner who has issued one or more written
recommendations in the preceding five years;
(9) A person who is not legally able to work in Nebraska; or
(10) A publicly traded company.
Sec. 95. (1) An application for initial issuance of a license shall
be accompanied by a fee in the following amount:
(a) For a vertical license, one hundred thousand dollars;
(b) For a cultivator license, twenty-five thousand dollars;
(c) For a products manufacturers license, twenty thousand dollars;
(d) For a dispensary license, twenty-five thousand dollars;
(e) For a transporter license, five thousand dollars; and
(f) For a testing facility license, twenty-five thousand dollars.
(2) An application for renewal of a license shall be accompanied by
a fee of five thousand dollars.
(3) Application fees paid to the commission shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Medical Cannabis Control Fund.
Sec. 96. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the commission shall approve or deny an application for issuance or
renewal of a license within one hundred twenty days after receiving a
completed application and the appropriate fee.
(2) With the applicant's written consent, the commission may extend
the deadline provided in this section.
-34-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Sec. 97. Upon receiving an application for a license, the
commission shall notify the clerk of the city or village in which such
license is sought or, if the license sought is not sought within a city
or village, the county clerk of the county in which such license is
sought, of the receipt of the application and shall include one copy of
the application with the notice. No such license shall be issued or
denied by the commission until the expiration of the time allowed for the
receipt of a recommendation of denial or a resident objection requiring a
hearing under subsection (1) or (2) of section 101 of this act. During
the period of forty-five days after the date of receipt by mail or
electronic delivery of such application from the commission, the local
governing body of such city, village, or county may make and submit to
the commission recommendations relative to the granting or denial of such
license to the applicant.
Sec. 98. (1) If no hearing is required pursuant to subsection (1)
or (2) of section 101 of this act and the commission has no objections
pursuant to subsection (3) of such section, the commission may waive the
forty-five-day objection period and, if not otherwise prohibited by law,
cause a license to be signed by its chairperson, attested by its
executive director over the seal of the commission, and issued in the
manner provided in subsection (5) of this section as a matter of course.
(2) A license may be issued to any qualified applicant if the
commission finds that:
(a) The applicant is fit, willing, and able to properly provide the
service proposed within the city, village, or county where the premises
described in the application are located;
(b) The applicant can conform to all provisions and requirements of
the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act and rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated thereunder;
(c) The applicant has demonstrated that the type of management and
control to be exercised over the premises described in the application
-35-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
will be sufficient to ensure that the licensed business can conform to
all provisions and requirements of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
thereunder; and
(d) The issuance of the license is or will be required by the
present or future public convenience and necessity.
(3) In making its determination pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, the commission shall consider:
(a) Any recommendation of the local governing body;
(b) Any resident objection made in accordance with section 101 of
this act;
(c) The existing population of the city, village, or county and its
projected growth;
(d) The nature of the neighborhood or community of the location of
the proposed licensed premises;
(e) The existence or absence of other licensees within the
neighborhood or community of the location of the proposed licensed
premises and whether, as evidenced by substantive, corroborative
documentation, the issuance of such license would result in or add to an
undue concentration of licenses;
(f) The existing motor vehicle and pedestrian traffic flow in the
vicinity of the proposed licensed premises;
(g) The adequacy of existing law enforcement;
(h) Zoning restrictions;
(i) The sanitation or sanitary conditions on or about the proposed
licensed premises; and
(j) Whether the type of business or activity proposed to be operated
in conjunction with the proposed license is and will be consistent with
the public interest.
(4) Until January 1, 2030, licenses other than for transporters
shall be issued on a competitive, merit-based application process.
-36-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Applicants for vertical licenses shall be given priority over applicants
for stand-alone licenses. Applicants will be evaluated on several core
criteria, with primary emphasis placed on comprehensive business plans,
financial stability, facility design, and operational readiness,
collectively ensuring a solid foundation for sustainable operations.
Additional prioritization will be given to applicants demonstrating local
ownership through Nebraska residency, a proven compliance history in
regulated industries, and relevant industry experience. This scoring
process is designed to foster a transparent, equitable, and community-
focused cannabis industry, ensuring public safety and patient
accessibility while maximizing local economic benefits.
(5) Licenses issued or renewed by the commission shall be mailed or
delivered electronically to:
(a) The clerk of the city, village, or county who shall deliver the
same to the licensee upon receipt from the licensee of proof of payment
of:
(i) Any fee for publication of notice of hearing before the local
governing body upon the application for the license;
(ii) The fee for publication of notice of renewal as provided in
section 104 of this act; and
(iii) Occupation taxes, if any, imposed by such city, village, or
county; or
(b) The licensee, upon confirmation from the clerk of the city,
village, or county that the necessary fees and taxes described in
subdivision (5)(a) of this section have been received.
Sec. 99. (1) In addition to the factors set forth in section 98 of
this act, the commission may deny issuance or renewal of a license for
good cause.
(2) For purposes of this section, good cause means:
(a) The licensee or applicant has violated, does not meet, or has
failed to comply with any of the terms, conditions, or provisions of the
-37-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, any rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated thereunder, or any ordinance;
(b) The licensee or applicant has made a materially false statement
to the commission;
(c) The licensee or applicant has failed to comply with any special
terms or conditions that were placed on its license pursuant to an order
of the commission; or
(d) The licensed premises have been operated in a manner that
adversely affects the public health or the safety of the immediate
neighborhood in which the establishment is located.
Sec. 100. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) College means any postsecondary institution as defined in
section 85-2403;
(b) Covered location means any college campus, any alcohol or drug
treatment facility, any school, or any child care facility or day care;
and
(c) School means any public or private elementary or secondary
school.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
no license shall be issued for a premises located within one thousand
feet of any covered location.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to a licensee
operating an established business that was in operation prior to the
covered location being established within one thousand feet of such
business.
(4)(a) Local governing bodies may adopt specific ordinances or
zoning maps identifying allowable areas for licensed premises.
(b) A local governing body may require a licensed premises to be
operated within a designated zone as follows:
(i) Cultivation facilities may operate in industrial or agricultural
zones;
-38-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(ii) Products manufacturer facilities may operate in industrial
zones; and
(iii) Dispensaries and testing facilities may be operated in any
area other than one designated as a residential zone.
(5) A local governing body may prohibit the operation of any type of
licensed premises.
Sec. 101. (1) The commission shall hold a hearing on an application
for a license if, within forty-five days after the date the application
was received by the city, village, or county clerk, the commission
receives a recommendation of denial from the city, village, or county.
(2)(a) The commission shall hold a hearing on an application for a
license if it receives written objections from at least three persons
residing in the city, village, or county where the licensed premises will
be located and such objections are received by the commission within the
following deadlines:
(i) If the city, village, or county provides the commission with a
recommendation that the application be granted, the objections must be
received no later than ten days after the commission receives such
recommendation; or
(ii) In all other cases, the objections must be received no later
than forty-five days after the date the city, village, or county clerk
received the application.
(b) The commission may conduct a hearing even though a resident
objection has been withdrawn. In such case the commission may conduct the
hearing based upon the objection as originally filed and may make
independent findings as to whether the license should be issued.
(3) The commission shall hold a hearing on an application for a
license if, within forty-five days after the date the application was
received by the city, village, or county clerk, the commission itself
objects to the issuance of the license or receives an objection from any
employee of the commission.
-39-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(4)(a) Hearings upon such applications shall be conducted as
provided in this subsection.
(b) At least fifteen days prior to such hearing, the commission
shall by mail or electronic delivery provide notice indicating the time
and place of such hearing to the applicant, the local governing body, and
each resident objector. The notice shall state that the commission will
receive evidence for the purpose of determining whether to approve or
deny the application. Mailing or electronic delivery to the attorney of
record of a party shall be deemed to fulfill the purposes of this
section.
(c) The commission may receive evidence, including testimony and
documentary evidence, and may hear and question witnesses concerning the
application.
(d) The commission shall not use electronic delivery with respect to
an applicant or an objector under this section without the consent of the
recipient.
Sec. 102. (1) When a local governing body receives from the
commission the notice and copy of application as provided in section 97
of this act for a license within the jurisdiction of the local governing
body, the local governing body may fix a time and place for a hearing at
which the local governing body shall receive evidence, either orally or
by affidavit from the applicant and any other person, bearing upon the
propriety of the issuance of a license.
(2) Notice of the time and place of such hearing shall be published
in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in such city, village,
or county one time not less than seven and not more than fourteen days
before the time of the hearing.
(3) Such notice shall include, but not be limited to, a statement
that all persons desiring to give evidence before the local governing
body in support of or in opposition to issuance of such license may do so
at the time of the hearing.
-40-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(4) Such hearing shall be held not more than forty-five days after
the date of receipt of the notice from the commission, and after such
hearing the local governing body shall cause to be recorded in the minute
record of their proceedings a resolution recommending either issuance or
denial of such license.
(5) The clerk of such city, village, or county shall mail to the
commission by first-class mail, postage prepaid, a copy of the resolution
which shall state the cost of the published notice, except that failure
to comply with this provision shall not void any license issued by the
commission.
(6) If the commission refuses to issue such a license, the cost of
publication of notice shall be paid by the commission from the security
for costs.
Sec. 103. (1) Ninety days prior to the expiration date of an
existing license, the commission shall notify the licensee of the
expiration date by first-class mail at the licensee's address of record
with the commission.
(2)(a) A license issued by the commission and outstanding may be
automatically renewed by the commission without formal application upon
payment of the renewal fee prior to or within thirty days after the
expiration of the license. The payment shall be an affirmative
representation and certification by the licensee that all answers
contained in an application, if submitted, would be the same in all
material respects as the answers contained in the last previous
application.
(b) The renewal privilege provided for in this section shall not be
construed as a vested right and shall not prevent the commission from
decreasing the number of licenses.
(3)(a) The commission may renew the license if the licensee is
qualified to receive a license, the location of the licensed premises has
not changed, and the licensed premises remain suitable to be used as
-41-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
such.
(b) The commission may also at any time require a licensee to submit
an application.
(c) Upon written request by the local governing body, the commission
shall require a licensee to submit an application.
Sec. 104. The city, village, or county clerk shall cause to be
published in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in such city,
village, or county, one time between January 10 and January 30 of the
year in which a license is up for renewal, individual notice of the right
of automatic renewal of such license. The notice shall be in
substantially the following form:
NOTICE OF RENEWAL OF MEDICAL CANNABIS LICENSE
Notice is hereby given pursuant to section 104 of this act that
[list type of license] license may be automatically renewed for one year
from May 1, 20...., for the following licensee:
(Name of Licensee) (Address of licensed premises)
Notice is hereby given that written objections to the issuance of
automatic renewal of license may be filed by any resident of the city
(village or county) on or before February 10, 20...., in the office of
the (city, village, or county) clerk. If written objections are filed by
at least three residents, the commission will hold a hearing to determine
whether the license should be renewed.
(Name)
(City, village, or county) Clerk
Sec. 105. Upon the conclusion of any renewal hearing required by
section 104 of this act, the local governing body may request a licensee
to submit an application as provided in section 103 of this act.
Sec. 106. A license is valid for a period of two years after the
date of issuance unless revoked or suspended pursuant to the Nebraska
Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or the rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated thereunder.
-42-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Sec. 107. Each license issued under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act shall:
(1) Specify the date of issuance, the type of license, the period of
licensure, the name of the licensee, and the premises licensed; and
(2) Be signed by the chairperson of the commission and attested by
the executive director over the seal of the commission.
Sec. 108. (1) At all times, a licensee shall possess and maintain
possession of the premises for which the license is issued by ownership,
lease, rental, or other arrangement for possession of the premises.
(2) At all times, a licensee shall maintain a copy of the license in
a conspicuous place on the licensed premises.
Sec. 109. (1) Each licensee shall personally manage the licensed
premises or employ a separate and distinct manager on the licensed
premises and shall report the name of the manager to the commission.
(2) The licensee shall report any change in manager to the
commission within seven days after the change.
Sec. 110. (1) A license is not transferable without approval of the
commission as provided in this section. A license shall not be
transferred during the first two years of its issuance. An application
for transfer of ownership of a license shall be:
(a) In the form and manner required by the commission;
(b) Accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of ten thousand dollars; and
(c) Verified by oath or affirmation of the persons prescribed by the
commission.
(2) An application for transfer of ownership shall include:
(a) The name and address of each party and how long the transferee
has resided in Nebraska;
(b) The names and addresses of the transferee's officers, directors,
or managers;
(c) The particular premises of the licensed premises, designating
the premises by street and number if practicable or, if not, by such
-43-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
other description as definitively locates the premises;
(d) The name of the owner of the premises upon which the business
licensed is to be operated;
(e) A statement that:
(i) If the application is submitted before January 1, 2030, that the
applicant satisfies the residency requirements of section 93 of this act;
and
(ii) The applicant is not disqualified under section 94 of this act;
(f) A statement that the transferee intends to operate the business
authorized by the license on its own behalf and not as the agent of any
other persons and that, if licensed, the transferee will operate such
business on its own behalf and not as the agent for any other person;
(g) A statement that the transferee intends to superintend in person
the management of the business licensed and that, if licensed, the
transferee will superintend in person the management of the business; and
(h) Such other information as the commission may direct.
(3) If any false statement is made in any part of an application,
the applicant shall be deemed guilty of perjury, and upon conviction
thereof the license shall be denied or revoked and the applicant
subjected to the penalties set forth in section 28-915.
(4) Upon receipt of an application, the transfer shall be considered
in the same manner as provided for applications for issuance or renewal
of a license under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, except
that the commission may by rule or regulation modify or streamline the
procedures or requirements, or the factors to be considered, in granting
transfer of ownership in light of the fact that the licensed premises is
already in operation.
Sec. 111. (1) A licensee shall not relocate the licensed premises
from the place specified in the license without approval of the
commission as provided in this section. An application for relocation of
a licensed premises shall be:
-44-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(a) In the form and manner required by the commission;
(b) Accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of one thousand dollars; and
(c) Verified by oath or affirmation of the persons prescribed by the
commission.
(2) An application for relocation of a licensed premises shall
include:
(a) The name and address of the applicant;
(b) The names and addresses of the applicant's officers, directors,
or managers;
(c) The current location of the licensed premises, designating the
same by street and number if practicable or, if not, by such other
description as definitively locates the licensed premises;
(d) The location to which the licensed premises is sought to be
relocated, designating the licensed premises by street and number if
practicable or, if not, by such other description as definitively locates
the new location;
(e) The name of the owner of the premises to which the licensed
premises is sought to be relocated; and
(f) Such other information as the commission may direct.
(3) If any false statement is made in any part of an application,
the applicant shall be deemed guilty of perjury, and upon conviction
thereof the license shall be denied or revoked and the applicant
subjected to the penalties set forth in section 28-915.
(4) Upon receipt of an application, the relocation shall be
considered in the same manner as provided for applications for issuance
or renewal of a license as set forth in the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act.
Sec. 112. (1) A license shall be purely a personal privilege.
(2) A license shall not:
(a) Constitute property;
(b) Be subject to attachment, garnishment, or execution;
-45-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(c) Except as provided in section 110 of this act, be alienable or
transferable, voluntarily or involuntarily; or
(d) Be subject to being encumbered or hypothecated.
(3) A license shall not descend by the laws of testate or intestate
succession, but it shall cease upon the death of the licensee, except
that:
(a) Personal representatives of the estate of any deceased licensee,
when such estate consists in part of a licensed operation, or a
partnership or limited liability company upon the death of one or more of
the partners or members, may continue the business of the licensee under
order of the appropriate court and may exercise the privileges of the
deceased or deceased partner or member after the death of such decedent
until the expiration of such license, but if such license would have
expired within two months following the death of the licensee, the
license may be renewed by the personal representatives with the approval
of the appropriate court for a period not to exceed one additional year;
and
(b) When a license is issued to spouses, as co-licensees with rights
of survivorship, upon the death of one spouse the survivor may exercise
all rights and privileges under such license in the survivor's own name.
(4) The trustee of any insolvent or bankrupt licensee, when such
estate consists in part of a licensed operation, may continue the
business of the licensed operation under order of the appropriate court
and may exercise the privileges of the insolvent or bankrupt licensee
until the expiration of such license.
Sec. 113. The commission, in its discretion, may revoke or elect
not to renew any license if it determines that the licensed premises have
been inactive, without good cause, for at least one year.
Sec. 114. The commission and local governing bodies shall cause
frequent inspection to be made on the premises of all licensees. If it is
found that any such licensee is violating any provision of the Nebraska
-46-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or the rules and regulations of the
commission adopted and promulgated under the act or is failing to observe
in good faith the purposes of the act, the license may be suspended,
canceled, or revoked after the licensee is given notice and an
opportunity to be heard.
Sec. 115. (1) In the discharge of any duty under the Nebraska
Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, the commission may issue subpoenas and
compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of any papers,
books, accounts, documents, and testimony.
(2) In case of disobedience on the part of any person to any
subpoena issued by the commission or the refusal of any witness to
testify on any matters regarding which such witness may be lawfully
interrogated, it shall be the duty of the district court for the county
in which such hearing was convened, on the application of a commissioner,
to compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of
disobedience to the requirements of a subpoena issued from such court or
a refusal to testify therein.
Sec. 116. Any five residents of the jurisdiction of the local
governing body in which a licensed premises is located shall have the
right to file a complaint with the local governing body stating that any
licensee subject to the jurisdiction of such local governing body has
been or is violating the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, any
rule or regulation adopted and promulgated thereunder, or any ordinance
regulating cannabis. Such complaint shall be in writing in the form
prescribed by the local governing body and shall be signed and sworn to
by the parties complaining. The complaint shall state the particular
statute, rule or regulation, or ordinance believed to have been violated
and the facts in detail upon which such belief is based. If the local
governing body is satisfied that the complaint substantially charges a
violation and that from the facts alleged there is reasonable cause for
such belief, it shall set the matter for hearing within ten days after
-47-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
the date of the filing of the complaint and shall serve notice upon the
licensee of the time and place of such hearing and of the particular
charge in the complaint. The complaint shall in all cases be disposed of
by resolution by the local governing body within thirty days after the
date the complaint was filed. Such resolution shall be deemed the final
order for purposes of appeal to the commission as provided in section 123
of this act.
Sec. 117. (1) The commission may, on its own motion or on
complaint, after investigation and opportunity for a public hearing at
which the licensee must be afforded an opportunity to be heard, sanction
a licensee for a violation by the licensee or by its agents or employees
of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, any rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder, any ordinance regulating
cannabis, or any of the terms, conditions, or provisions of the license.
(2) The commission shall provide written notice of the hearing, by
mailing the notice to the licensee at the address contained in the
license and, if different, at the last address furnished to the
commission by the licensee.
(3) All proceedings for the suspension or revocation of a license or
imposition of other sanction against a licensee shall be before the
commission, and the proceedings shall be in accordance with rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission not inconsistent
with law.
(4) No licensee shall be subject to sanctions except after a hearing
by the commission with reasonable notice to the licensee and opportunity
to appear and defend.
(5) In conducting a hearing under this section, the commission may
administer oaths and issue subpoenas to require the presence of persons
and the production of papers, books, and records necessary to the
determination of any hearing.
(6) Any license may be summarily suspended by the commission without
-48-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
notice pending any prosecution, investigation, or public hearing of a
licensee.
(7) If a licensee is convicted of a violation of the Nebraska
Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, any rule or regulation adopted and
promulgated thereunder, or any ordinance regulating cannabis, the court
shall promptly notify the commission and the local governing body.
Sec. 118. Upon the completion of any hearing held regarding
discipline of a license, the director may dismiss the action or impose
any of the following sanctions:
(1) Censure;
(2) Probation;
(3) Limitation;
(4) Civil penalty;
(5) Suspension for up to six months;
(6) Seizure of cannabis that is the subject of a violation of the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act; or
(7) Revocation.
Sec. 119. (1) If a civil penalty is imposed pursuant to section 118
of this act, it shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars.
(2) Any fine or civil penalty assessed and unpaid shall constitute a
debt to the State of Nebraska which may be collected in the manner of a
lien foreclosure or sued for and recovered in a proper form of action in
the name of the state in the district court of the county in which the
violator resides or owns property. In such action the commission may also
collect attorney's fees and costs incurred in the collection of the civil
penalty. The commission shall, within thirty days after receipt, remit
any collected civil penalty to the State Treasurer to be disposed of in
accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 120. (1) If the commission determines that cannabis in the
possession of a licensee is involved in a violation of the Nebraska
Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, the rules and regulations adopted and
-49-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
promulgated thereunder, an ordinance regulating cannabis, or any terms or
conditions of a license, the commission may declare such cannabis to be
contraband and seize and destroy or dispose of it in accordance with
rules and regulations of the commission. The commission may also seize
and dispose of associated property.
(2) Following issuance of a final decision by the commission
authorizing seizure and destruction of cannabis or associated property of
a licensee, the licensee shall have fifteen days to file a petition for a
stay. The petition shall be filed in the district court of Lancaster
County. The district court shall expeditiously issue a preliminary ruling
upon the petition determining whether the licensee has a substantial
likelihood of success on judicial review so as to warrant a temporary
stay of the seizure and destruction or disposal of the cannabis and any
associated property. If the court grants a temporary stay, the court
shall issue an order setting forth terms and conditions pursuant to which
the licensee may maintain possession of the cannabis and associated
property pending a final decision on the merits of the licensee's
petition. Such order shall prohibit the licensee from using,
distributing, or disposing of the cannabis and any associated property.
(3) If the licensee fails to timely file a petition under subsection
(2) of this section, the commission may destroy or dispose of the seized
cannabis and any associated property.
(4) A county attorney shall notify the commission if the county
attorney begins investigating a licensee for violations of the Nebraska
Medical Cannabis Regulation Act. Upon receipt of such a notification, the
commission shall not destroy or dispose of any cannabis or associated
property of such licensee until the county attorney has completed such
investigation.
(5) For purposes of this section, associated property means
containers, equipment, supplies, and other property closely associated
with the conduct that is the subject of the violation.
-50-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Sec. 121. The state, local governments, and any state or local
agency shall not be required to cultivate or care for any cannabis seized
for a violation of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
Sec. 122. (1) A copy of the rule, regulation, order, or decision of
the commission denying an application or suspending, revoking, or
imposing another sanction against a licensee or of any notice required by
any proceeding before it, certified under the seal of the commission,
shall be served upon each party of record to the proceeding before the
commission. Service upon any attorney of record for any such party shall
be deemed to be service upon such party. Each party appearing before the
commission shall enter the party's appearance and indicate to the
commission the party's address for such service. The mailing of a copy of
any rule, regulation, order, or decision of the commission or of any
notice by the commission, in the proceeding, to such party at such
address shall be deemed to be service upon such party.
(2) Within thirty days after the service described in subsection (1)
of this section, such party may apply for a rehearing with respect to any
matters determined by the commission. The commission shall receive and
consider such application for a rehearing within thirty days after its
filing with the executive director of the commission. If such application
for rehearing is granted, the commission shall proceed as promptly as
possible to consider the matters presented by such application. No appeal
shall be allowed from any decision of the commission except as provided
in section 123 of this act.
(3) Upon final disposition of any proceeding, costs shall be paid by
the party or parties against whom a final decision is rendered. Only one
rehearing referred to in subsection (2) of this section shall be granted
by the commission on application of any one party.
(4) For purposes of this section, party of record means:
(a) The applicant or licensee;
(b) Any individual objecting pursuant to subsection (2) of section
-51-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
101 of this act;
(c) The local governing body if it is entering an appearance to
protest or requesting a hearing; and
(d) The commission.
Sec. 123. Any order or decision by the commission granting or
denying issuance or renewal of a license, a request to transfer ownership
of a license, or a request to relocate a licensed premises; suspending,
revoking, or imposing another sanction against a licensee; or refusing to
suspend, revoke, or impose another sanction against a licensee may be
appealed. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.
Sec. 124. Nothing in the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act
shall be construed to limit a law enforcement agency's ability to
investigate unlawful activity in relation to a licensee.
Sec. 125. A local governing body shall have the following powers,
functions, and duties with respect to licenses within its jurisdiction:
(1) To cancel or revoke for cause licenses, subject to the right of
appeal to the commission;
(2) To enter or to authorize any law enforcement officer to enter at
any time upon any licensed premises to determine whether any provision of
the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, any rule or regulation
adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, or any ordinance has been or
is being violated and at such time examine the premises of such licensee
in connection with such determination. Any law enforcement officer who
determines that any such violation has occurred or is occurring shall
report such violation in writing to the executive director of the
commission within thirty days after the latest of the following:
(a) Determining that such violation has occurred;
(b) The conclusion of an ongoing police investigation; or
(c) The verdict in a prosecution related to such an ongoing police
investigation if the prosecuting attorney determines that reporting such
-52-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
violation prior to the verdict would jeopardize such prosecution;
(3) To receive a signed complaint from any resident within its
jurisdiction that any provision of the act, any rule or regulation
adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, or any ordinance relating to
cannabis has been or is being violated and to take action upon such
complaints in the manner provided in the act;
(4) To examine or cause to be examined any applicant or any
licensee, upon whom notice of cancellation or revocation has been served
as provided in the act, to examine or cause to be examined the books and
records of any applicant or licensee, and to hear testimony and to take
proof for its information in the performance of its duties. For purposes
of obtaining any of the information desired, the local governing body may
authorize its agent or attorney to take action on its behalf;
(5) To cancel or revoke on its own motion any license if, upon the
same notice and hearing as provided in section 116 of this act, it
determines that the licensee has violated any of the provisions of the
act, any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act,
or any ordinance relating to cannabis. Such order of cancellation or
revocation may be appealed to the commission within thirty days after the
date of the order by filing a notice of appeal with the commission. The
commission shall handle the appeal in the manner provided for hearing on
an application in section 101 of this act; and
(6) To impose an occupation tax on a licensee, not to exceed an
annual limit of the greater of five thousand dollars or two percent of
the licensee's gross receipts.
Sec. 126. (1) Local governing bodies shall only have authority to
approve applications and deny licenses pursuant to the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act.
(2)(a) Subject to section 80 of this act, a local governing body may
regulate by ordinance, not inconsistent with the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act, the business of all licensees operating within
-53-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
the jurisdiction of the local governing body.
(b) Such ordinances may be more strict than those set forth in the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act. Such standards may include, but
are not limited to:
(i) Distance restrictions between licensed premises of any type or
the same type;
(ii) Reasonable restrictions on the size of a licensed premises; and
(iii) Any other requirements necessary to ensure the local control
of licensees to aid enforcement of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act, ordinances, or the terms and conditions of a license.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of section 100 of this act,
any ordinance regulating conduct authorized by the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act shall not make it unreasonably impracticable to
operate as a licensee.
Sec. 127. (1) No licensee shall:
(a) Sell or transfer cannabis to any individual younger than
eighteen years of age;
(b) Allow any individual younger than eighteen years of age on its
premises;
(c) Employ or retain any individual younger than eighteen years of
age.
(2) A licensee other than a dispensary shall not sell or transfer
cannabis to any person other than:
(a) A licensee, to the extent permitted by the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act;
(b) The commission; or
(c) A person designated by the commission.
(3) A dispensary shall not sell or transfer cannabis to any person
other than:
(a) Another dispensary;
(b) A qualified patient or registered caregiver; or
-54-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(c) A person designated by the commission.
Sec. 128. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Escorted means appropriately checked into the limited access
area and accompanied by a person authorized by the commission, except
that trade craftspeople not normally engaged in the business of
cultivating, processing, testing, or selling cannabis need not be
accompanied on a full-time basis, but only reasonably monitored; and
(b) Limited access area means a building, room, or other contiguous
area upon a licensed premises where cannabis is cultivated, processed,
stored, weighed, packaged, or tested, under control of the licensee.
(2) Only those persons authorized by the commission and those
visitors escorted by a person authorized by the commission may enter a
limited access area. All areas of ingress or egress to limited access
areas shall be clearly identified as such by a sign as designated by the
commission.
Sec. 129. All cultivation, processing, and manufacture of cannabis
shall:
(1) Take place at a licensed premises approved by the commission and
within an area that is enclosed and locked in a manner that restricts
access to only authorized persons. The area may be uncovered only if it
is enclosed with security fencing that is designed to prevent
unauthorized entry and that is at least ten feet high; and
(2) Take place on property in the licensee's lawful possession or
with the consent of the person in lawful physical possession of the
property.
Sec. 130. Each licensee shall:
(1) Secure every entrance to the licensed premises so that access to
areas containing cannabis is restricted to persons authorized to possess
cannabis; and
(2) Secure the inventory and equipment of the licensed premises
during and after operating hours to deter and prevent theft of cannabis.
-55-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Sec. 131. A licensee shall not permit the consumption of cannabis
on any licensed premises.
Sec. 132. (1) Each licensee shall keep a complete set of all
records necessary to fully document the business transactions of the
licensee, all of which shall be open at all times during business hours
for the inspection and examination by the commission or its designee.
(2) The commission may require any licensee to furnish such
information as the commission considers necessary for the proper
administration of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act and may
require an audit to be made of the books of account and records on such
occasions as the commission may consider necessary by an auditor to be
selected by the commission who shall likewise have access to all books
and records of the licensee. Any such audit expense shall be paid by the
licensee.
(3) The commission or its designee may examine and inspect or
provide for the examination and inspection of any licensee, licensed
premises, or the records or operations of any licensee in such manner and
at such times as provided in rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the commission. The commission shall issue an examination
and inspection report and provide a copy of the report to the licensee
within ten working days after the completion of an examination and
inspection. The commission shall post a copy of the report on its
website.
(4) The refusal, impediment, obstruction, or interference with an
inspection of the licensed premises or records of a licensee by a
licensee or its agent or employee is a violation of the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act.
(5) If a licensee or an agent or employee of a licensee fails to
maintain or provide the records required pursuant to the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act, the licensee shall be subject to a citation and
fine of up to fifteen thousand dollars per individual violation.
-56-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Sec. 133. (1) Every sale or transfer of cannabis from one licensee
to another licensee shall be recorded on a sales invoice or receipt.
Sales invoices and receipts may be maintained electronically. Sales
invoices and receipts shall:
(a) Be entered into a seed-to-sale tracking system;
(b) Be filed in such manner as to be readily accessible for
examination by employees of the commission; and
(c) Not be commingled with invoices covering other commodities.
(2) Each sales invoice or receipt shall include the name and address
of the seller and shall include the following information:
(a) Name and address of the purchaser;
(b) Date of sale and invoice number;
(c) Kind, quantity, size, and capacity of packages of cannabis sold;
(d) The cost to the purchaser, together with any discount applied to
the price as shown on the invoice;
(e) The place from which transport of the cannabis was made unless
transport was made from the premises of the licensee; and
(f) Any other information specified by the commission.
Sec. 134. Any licensee may provide a sample of its cannabis or
cannabis products to a testing facility for testing and research
purposes. The licensee shall maintain a record of what was provided to
the testing facility, the identity of the testing facility, and the
testing results.
Sec. 135. (1)(a) On or before January 1, 2026, the commission shall
develop a statewide track and trace system that is capable of tracking
and tracing information concerning cannabis cultivated, processed,
manufactured, distributed, transported, sold, tested, or disposed of in
this state by all licensees.
(b) The commission shall maintain the confidentiality of information
in the track and trace system as provided in section 84 of this act.
(2) Each licensee shall, in accordance with the commission's rules
-57-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
and regulations, use a seed-to-sale tracking system. Any such system
shall be approved by the commission before use. The system must be
capable of:
(a) Interfacing with the statewide track and trace system so a
licensee may enter and access information in the statewide track and
trace system as required for inventory control and tracking and for
purchase limitations;
(b) Providing the commission with access to all information stored
in the system's database;
(c) Maintaining confidentiality of qualified patient and registered
caregiver data and records so that persons or entities other than the
commission may only access the information in the system that they are
authorized by law to access; and
(d) Producing analytical reports to the commission regarding:
(i) Total quantity of daily, monthly, and yearly sales at the
licensed premises per product type;
(ii) Average prices of daily, monthly, and yearly sales at the
licensed premises per product type; and
(iii) Total inventory or sales record adjustments at the licensed
premises.
Sec. 136. (1) No person shall add harmful additives to any cannabis
or cannabis product, including, but not limited to, those that are toxic,
designed to make the product addictive, designed to make the product
appealing to children, or misleading to consumers. This section does not
prohibit the addition of common baking or cooking ingredients.
(2) No person shall sell cannabis mixed with nicotine or alcohol.
Sec. 137. (1) No licensee shall cultivate, manufacture, sell, or
otherwise transact business with any products containing cannabinoids
other than those that were produced and distributed in compliance with
the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or the Nebraska Hemp Farming
Act.
-58-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(2) A cannabis product may include cannabinoids extracted or derived
from cannabis cultivated and processed in accordance with the Nebraska
Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, but shall not include synthetic
cannabinoids.
(3) A cannabis product may include hemp-derived nonintoxicating
cannabinoids but shall not include hemp-derived intoxicating
cannabinoids.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) Hemp-derived means a cannabinoid extracted from hemp, including
a cannabinoid with a chemical makeup that is changed after extraction to
create a different cannabinoid or other chemical compound by applying a
catalyst other than heat or light;
(b)(i) Intoxicating cannabinoid means a cannabinoid, including an
artificially derived cannabinoid, that when introduced into the human
body, impairs the central nervous system or impairs the human audio,
visual, or mental processes. Intoxicating cannabinoid includes, but is
not limited to, any form of THC.
(ii) Intoxicating cannabinoid does not include a nonintoxicating
cannabinoid;
(c) Nonintoxicating cannabinoid means a cannabinoid that, when
introduced into the human body, does not impair the central nervous
system and does not impair the human audio, visual, or mental processes.
Nonintoxicating cannabinoid includes, but is not limited to, cannabidiol
(CBD), cannabichromene (CBC), cannabielsoin (CBE), cannabigerol (CBG),
cannabidivarin (CBDV), and cannabinol (CBN); and
(d) Synthetic cannabinoid means a substance with a similar chemical
structure and pharmacological activity to a cannabinoid but that is not
extracted or derived from hemp or cannabis and is instead created or
produced by chemical or biochemical synthesis.
Sec. 138. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations for the packaging of cannabis, cannabis products, and
-59-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
concentrated cannabis which shall include:
(1) Special packaging requirements to protect children from
ingesting or consuming cannabis;
(2) Requirements for dividing each serving within a package
containing multiple servings in a manner that allows qualified patients
and registered caregivers to easily identify a single serving; and
(3) Requirements to ensure that packaging and labels are not
attractive to children.
Sec. 139. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
prior to transfer or sale to a qualified patient or registered caregiver
by a dispensary, all cannabis, cannabis products, and concentrated
cannabis shall be labeled and placed in an opaque, resealable, and child-
resistant package in accordance with the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
thereunder.
(2) Non-ingestible cannabis products, such as topical creams or
patches, are exempt from the requirements concerning resealable and
child-resistant packaging of this section.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) Opaque means that the packaging does not allow the product to be
seen without opening the packaging material; and
(b) Resealable means that the package continues to function within
effectiveness specifications, which shall be established by the
commission, similar to the federal Poison Prevention Packaging Act of
1970, 15 U.S.C. 1471 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025, for
the number of opening and closings customary for its size and contents,
which shall be determined by the commission.
Sec. 140. The label required by section 139 of this act shall
include the following information prominently displayed in a clear and
legible fashion and in a font size no smaller than nine-point Arial or
ten-point Times New Roman:
-60-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(1) The source and date of cultivation, the type of product, and the
date of manufacturing and packaging;
(2) Text warning of the unidentified health risks that reads:
"Warning: This product has intoxicating effects. There may be health
risks associated with consumption of this product.";
(3) If the cannabis is intended for consumption by smoking, text
stating "Smoking is hazardous to your health.";
(4) Text that reads: "For medical use by qualified patients only.";
(5) Text warning of the risks to vulnerable populations that reads:
"There may be additional health risks associated with the consumption of
this product for women who are pregnant, breastfeeding, or planning on
becoming pregnant.";
(6) Text that reads: "Not for resale or transfer.";
(7) Text that reads: "Cannabis impairs concentration, coordination,
and judgment. It is illegal to drive a motor vehicle while under the
influence of cannabis.";
(8) Text that reads: "This product is a controlled substance under
federal law. This product may be unlawful outside the State of
Nebraska.";
(9) A list of any solvents, nonorganic pesticides, herbicides, and
fertilizers that were used in the cultivation, production, and
manufacture of such cannabis, cannabis product, or concentrated cannabis;
(10) A batch or lot number;
(11) A description of the type of product, such as flower, edible,
or concentrate; and
(12) Any other information or statement required by the commission.
Sec. 141. The principal display area of any packaging or label
required by section 139 of this act shall:
(1) Include a universal symbol, established by the commission,
indicating the package contains cannabis; and
(2) Have text that reads: "Contains cannabis. Keep out of reach of
-61-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
children.".
Sec. 142. The label required under section 139 of this act shall,
for edible cannabis products:
(1) Have text that reads: "Caution: This product is infused with
cannabis. The intoxicating effects of this product may be delayed by two
or more hours.";
(2) List all ingredients and disclose nutritional information in the
same manner as the federal nutritional labeling requirements in 21 C.F.R.
101.9, as such section existed on January 1, 2025; and
(3) Include a warning if nuts or other allergens are used.
Sec. 143. A licensee shall not market, advertise, sell, or cause to
be sold a cannabis product if the product's container, packaging, or
advertising:
(1) Depicts a cartoon-like fictional character that mimics a
character primarily aimed at entertaining minors;
(2) Imitates or mimics trademarks or trade dress of products that
are or have been primarily marketed to minors;
(3) Includes a symbol that is primarily used to market products to
minors; or
(4) Includes an image of a celebrity.
Sec. 144. (1) Subject to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation
Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder, a
cultivator may cultivate and process cannabis plants for sale to
dispensaries, to products manufacturers, and to other cultivators, but
not to qualified patients or registered caregivers.
(2) A cultivator shall track the cannabis it cultivates and
distributes using a seed-to-sale tracking system.
(3) The commission shall allow cultivation indoors, outdoors, and in
greenhouse facilities.
(4) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
concerning the cultivation of cannabis, which shall include:
-62-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(a) Permitted and prohibited pesticides;
(b) Testing requirements for pesticide residues and other hazardous
substances;
(c) Destruction requirements and protocols for cannabis failing to
meet pesticide or hazardous substance requirements;
(d) Record-keeping requirements; and
(e) Waste disposal requirements and procedures.
Sec. 145. (1) A products manufacturer may process cannabis, conduct
extractions, and may manufacture cannabis products intended for use by
qualified patients.
(2) These products may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Cannabis-infused edibles, such as baked goods, candies, and
beverages;
(b) Tinctures;
(c) Capsules;
(d) Topical formulations, such as creams, balms, and lotions;
(e) Concentrates, such as oils, waxes, shatter, and distillates;
(f) Transdermal patches;
(g) Suppositories;
(h) Pre-rolled flower products; and
(i) Pre-filled vaporizer cartridges.
(3) A products manufacturer may sell or transfer cannabis products
to dispensaries and to other products manufacturers.
Sec. 146. A products manufacturer shall:
(1) Process and prepare cannabis into a form allowable under the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act prior to distribution to any
dispensary;
(2) Contract with an independent testing facility, subject to
approval by the commission, for purposes of testing products made by the
products manufacturer as to chemical composition, contamination, and
consistency; and
-63-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(3) Enter cannabis purchased and cannabis products sold,
distributed, transferred, or disposed of into a seed-to-sale tracking
system.
Sec. 147. (1) A products manufacturer may use any extraction method
or solvent that complies with state and federal safety standards and the
rules and regulations of the commission. Approved solvents may include,
but are not limited to, ethanol, carbon dioxide, hydrocarbons such as
butane and propane, and water-based methods.
(2) A products manufacturer shall:
(a) Conduct all extraction processes using equipment certified for
safety by a nationally recognized testing laboratory;
(b) Implement and maintain ventilation, fire suppression, and other
safety measures appropriate to the extraction method used; and
(c) If using volatile solvents, conduct operations in commission-
approved Class 1, Division 1 (C1D1) or equivalent explosion-proof rooms,
equipped with proper ventilation, gas detection, and fire suppression
systems. Prior to commencing operations, the licensee must obtain written
sign-off from the local fire department and the State Fire Marshal to
confirm compliance with local and state building, fire, and hazardous
material handling codes.
(3) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to carry out this section. Such rules and regulations shall:
(a) Allow for the use of proprietary or emerging extraction
technologies. Licensees shall submit documentation of safety and efficacy
for commission review and approval;
(b) Provide for processes requirements for local fire departments
and the State Fire Marshal to carry out this section;
(c) Include requirements to ensure that equipment and processes meet
stringent safety and engineering standards; and
(d) Provide for flexibility for innovation and efficiency while
maintaining rigorous public health and worker safety standards.
-64-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Sec. 148. (1) A dispensary may sell cannabis to qualified patients
and registered caregivers and other dispensaries pursuant to the
requirements and restrictions of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation
Act and the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act.
(2) A dispensary may purchase cannabis from a cultivator, a products
manufacturer, or another dispensary.
(3) A dispensary shall track all of its cannabis from the point that
it is transferred from another licensee to the point of sale using a
seed-to-sale tracking system.
Sec. 149. A dispensary shall do the following for every sale of
cannabis to a registered caregiver or qualified patient:
(1) Receive the transaction order at the dispensary directly from
the qualified patient or registered caregiver and not from a third party.
This may be done in person, by telephone, or via the Internet;
(2) Prior to sale, ensure that the qualified patient or registered
caregiver presents a valid, unexpired registry card;
(3) Verify through the statewide track and trace system that the
qualified patient or registered caregiver is currently authorized to
purchase the amount of cannabis requested; and
(4) In the case of a delivery order, receive payment before the
cannabis leaves the dispensary, subject to refund if the delivery cannot
be completed.
Sec. 150. A dispensary shall not sell a qualified patient or
registered caregiver more than an allowable amount of cannabis.
Sec. 151. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations that limit the amount of cannabis inventory that a dispensary
may have on hand. Any such limitation must be commercially reasonable and
consider factors including a dispensary's sales history.
Sec. 152. A display case in a dispensary containing concentrated
cannabis shall include the potency of the concentrated cannabis next to
the name of the product.
-65-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Sec. 153. A dispensary shall only accept a return and issue a
refund if the cannabis has not been removed from the packaging in which
the cannabis arrived at the dispensary. This restriction applies even if
the packaging has been removed by dispensary staff prior to the sale.
Sec. 154. A dispensary shall not give away cannabis as part of a
promotional event.
Sec. 155. Physicians are not allowed to meet with individuals on
the dispensary's premises for the purpose of certifying them as qualified
patients.
Sec. 156. A dispensary shall report any theft or attempted theft of
cannabis to law enforcement within twenty-four hours after discovery.
Sec. 157. The licensed premises of a dispensary shall be designed
in order to accomplish the following:
(1) The general public, qualified patients, and registered
caregivers may only enter the dispensary through one access point into an
area where licensee agents shall screen individuals for qualified patient
or registered caregiver status. No cannabis shall be accessible in this
area; and
(2) Only qualified patients, registered caregivers, and, if
requested by a qualified patient, up to two additional persons to support
the qualified patient, may enter any areas beyond the access point area.
Sec. 158. (1) A testing facility may analyze, test, and certify
cannabis, including for potency and the presence of contaminants, in
accordance with the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
(2) When a testing facility has completed testing a sample of
cannabis, the sample shall be disposed of in accordance with the rules
and regulations of the commission.
(3) A testing facility shall track all cannabis from its receipt
until its disposal using a seed-to-sale tracking system.
Sec. 159. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
a license shall not be issued or renewed for a testing facility unless
-66-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
the facility is accredited by a body that is recognized by the
International Laboratory Accreditation Cooperation in an appropriate
category of testing pursuant to the International Organization for
Standardization.
(2) The commission may by rule and regulation establish conditions
for providing extensions to a newly licensed testing facility to obtain
accreditation required by this section for a period not to exceed twelve
months. Extensions may be granted for good cause, which includes, but
shall not be limited to, when an application for accreditation has been
submitted and is pending with a recognized accrediting body.
Sec. 160. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations for testing requirements for testing facilities. The
commission may adopt standards based on those of the International
Organization for Standardization. The testing requirements shall include:
(1) Determining accurately, with respect to cannabis:
(a) The concentration of delta-9 THC, cannabidiol, and other
cannabinoids;
(b) The presence and identification of mold and fungus;
(c) The composition; and
(d) The presence of chemicals, including, but not limited to,
pesticides, herbicides, or growth regulators; and
(2) Demonstrating the validity and accuracy of the methods used to
test cannabis.
Sec. 161. (1) A person who has an interest in a testing facility
shall not have any interest in any dispensary, cultivator, or products
manufacturer.
(2) A person that has an interest in a dispensary, cultivator, or
products manufacturer shall not have any interest in a testing facility.
Sec. 162. The state or any local government shall not employ or use
the results of any test of cannabis conducted by a laboratory unless such
laboratory is a testing facility or otherwise accredited for the
-67-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
particular field of testing in accordance with the rules and regulations
of the commission.
Sec. 163. Subject to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act
and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder, a
transporter may transport cannabis and cannabis accessories between
licensees, but not to qualified patients or registered caregivers.
Sec. 164. A violation of any provision of the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act for which a penalty is not otherwise provided
shall be a Class IV misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class II
misdemeanor for any subsequent offense.
Sec. 165. Any licensee who permits, assents, or is a party in any
way to any violation or infringement of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act shall be deemed guilty of a violation of the act. Any
money loaned contrary to a provision of the act shall not be recovered
back. Any note, mortgage, or other evidence of indebtedness, any
security, or any lease or contract obtained or made contrary to the act
shall be unenforceable and void.
Sec. 166. If the owner of the licensed premises or any person from
whom the licensee derives the right to possession of such premises, or
the agent of such owner or person, knowingly permits the licensee to use
such licensed premises in violation of the terms of the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act, such owner, agent, or other person shall be
deemed guilty of a violation of the act to the same extent as such
licensee and be subject to the same punishment.
Sec. 167. Every act or omission of whatsoever nature constituting a
violation of any of the provisions of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act by any officer, director, manager, or other agent or
employee of any licensee, if such act is committed or omission is made
with the authorization, knowledge, or approval of the licensee, shall be
deemed and held to be the act of such employer or licensee, and such
employer or licensee shall be punishable in the same manner as if such
-68-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
act or omission had been done or omitted by him or her personally.
Sec. 168. Section 28-416, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-416 (1) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act, or the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, it shall be unlawful for any
person knowingly or intentionally: (a) To manufacture, distribute,
deliver, dispense, or possess with intent to manufacture, distribute,
deliver, or dispense a controlled substance; or (b) to create,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute a counterfeit controlled
substance.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (4), (5), (7), (8), (9), and
(10) of this section, any person who violates subsection (1) of this
section with respect to: (a) A controlled substance classified in
Schedule I, II, or III of section 28-405 which is an exceptionally
hazardous drug shall be guilty of a Class II felony; (b) any other
controlled substance classified in Schedule I, II, or III of section
28-405 shall be guilty of a Class IIA felony; or (c) a controlled
substance classified in Schedule IV or V of section 28-405 shall be
guilty of a Class IIIA felony.
(3) A person knowingly or intentionally possessing a controlled
substance, except marijuana or any substance containing a quantifiable
amount of the substances, chemicals, or compounds described, defined, or
delineated in subdivision (c)(27) of Schedule I of section 28-405, unless
such substance was obtained directly or pursuant to a medical order
issued by a practitioner authorized to prescribe while acting in the
course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise
authorized by the act, shall be guilty of a Class IV felony. A person
shall not be in violation of this subsection if section 28-472 or 28-1701
applies.
(4)(a) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances
-69-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Act, any person eighteen years of age or older who knowingly or
intentionally manufactures, distributes, delivers, dispenses, or
possesses with intent to manufacture, distribute, deliver, or dispense a
controlled substance or a counterfeit controlled substance (i) to a
person under the age of eighteen years, (ii) in, on, or within one
thousand feet of the real property comprising a public or private
elementary, vocational, or secondary school, a community college, a
public or private college, junior college, or university, or a
playground, or (iii) within one hundred feet of a public or private youth
center, public swimming pool, or video arcade facility shall be punished
by the next higher penalty classification than the penalty prescribed in
subsection (2), (7), (8), (9), or (10) of this section, depending upon
the controlled substance involved, for the first violation and for a
second or subsequent violation shall be punished by the next higher
penalty classification than that prescribed for a first violation of this
subsection, but in no event shall such person be punished by a penalty
greater than a Class IB felony.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Playground means any outdoor facility, including any parking lot
appurtenant to the facility, intended for recreation, open to the public,
and with any portion containing three or more apparatus intended for the
recreation of children, including sliding boards, swingsets, and
teeterboards;
(ii) Video arcade facility means any facility legally accessible to
persons under eighteen years of age, intended primarily for the use of
pinball and video machines for amusement, and containing a minimum of ten
pinball or video machines; and
(iii) Youth center means any recreational facility or gymnasium,
including any parking lot appurtenant to the facility or gymnasium,
intended primarily for use by persons under eighteen years of age which
regularly provides athletic, civic, or cultural activities.
-70-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(5)(a) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, it shall be unlawful for any person eighteen years of age or older
to knowingly and intentionally employ, hire, use, cause, persuade, coax,
induce, entice, seduce, or coerce any person under the age of eighteen
years to manufacture, transport, distribute, carry, deliver, dispense,
prepare for delivery, offer for delivery, or possess with intent to do
the same a controlled substance or a counterfeit controlled substance.
(b) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances Act,
it shall be unlawful for any person eighteen years of age or older to
knowingly and intentionally employ, hire, use, cause, persuade, coax,
induce, entice, seduce, or coerce any person under the age of eighteen
years to aid and abet any person in the manufacture, transportation,
distribution, carrying, delivery, dispensing, preparation for delivery,
offering for delivery, or possession with intent to do the same of a
controlled substance or a counterfeit controlled substance.
(c) Any person who violates subdivision (a) or (b) of this
subsection shall be punished by the next higher penalty classification
than the penalty prescribed in subsection (2), (7), (8), (9), or (10) of
this section, depending upon the controlled substance involved, for the
first violation and for a second or subsequent violation shall be
punished by the next higher penalty classification than that prescribed
for a first violation of this subsection, but in no event shall such
person be punished by a penalty greater than a Class IB felony.
(6) It shall not be a defense to prosecution for violation of
subsection (4) or (5) of this section that the defendant did not know the
age of the person through whom the defendant violated such subsection.
(7) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to cocaine or any mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of cocaine in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
-71-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(8) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to base cocaine (crack) or any mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of base cocaine in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(9) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to heroin or any mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of heroin in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(10) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its
isomers, or with respect to methamphetamine, its salts, optical isomers,
and salts of its isomers, in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
-72-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(11) Except as provided in the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient
Protection Act or the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, any Any
person knowingly or intentionally possessing marijuana weighing more than
one ounce but not more than one pound shall be guilty of a Class III
misdemeanor.
(12) Except as provided in the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient
Protection Act or the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, any Any
person knowingly or intentionally possessing marijuana weighing more than
one pound shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(13) Except as provided in the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient
Protection Act or the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or section
28-1701, any person knowingly or intentionally possessing marijuana
weighing one ounce or less or any substance containing a quantifiable
amount of the substances, chemicals, or compounds described, defined, or
delineated in subdivision (c)(27) of Schedule I of section 28-405 shall:
(a) For the first offense, be guilty of an infraction, receive a
citation, be fined three hundred dollars, and be assigned to attend a
course as prescribed in section 29-433 if the judge determines that
attending such course is in the best interest of the individual
defendant;
(b) For the second offense, be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor,
receive a citation, and be fined four hundred dollars and may be
imprisoned not to exceed five days; and
(c) For the third and all subsequent offenses, be guilty of a Class
IIIA misdemeanor, receive a citation, be fined five hundred dollars, and
be imprisoned not to exceed seven days.
(14) Any person convicted of violating this section, if placed on
probation, shall, as a condition of probation, satisfactorily attend and
complete appropriate treatment and counseling on drug abuse provided by a
program authorized under the Nebraska Behavioral Health Services Act or
-73-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
other licensed drug treatment facility.
(15) Any person convicted of violating this section, if sentenced to
the Department of Correctional Services, shall attend appropriate
treatment and counseling on drug abuse.
(16) Any person knowingly or intentionally possessing a firearm
while in violation of subsection (1) of this section shall be punished by
the next higher penalty classification than the penalty prescribed in
subsection (2), (7), (8), (9), or (10) of this section, but in no event
shall such person be punished by a penalty greater than a Class IB
felony.
(17) A person knowingly or intentionally in possession of money used
or intended to be used to facilitate a violation of subsection (1) of
this section shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(18) In addition to the existing penalties available for a violation
of subsection (1) of this section, including any criminal attempt or
conspiracy to violate subsection (1) of this section, a sentencing court
may order that any money, securities, negotiable instruments, firearms,
conveyances, or electronic communication devices as defined in section
28-833 or any equipment, components, peripherals, software, hardware, or
accessories related to electronic communication devices be forfeited as a
part of the sentence imposed if it finds by clear and convincing evidence
adduced at a separate hearing in the same prosecution, following
conviction for a violation of subsection (1) of this section, and
conducted pursuant to section 28-1601, that any or all such property was
derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a violation of
subsection (1) of this section.
(19) In addition to the penalties provided in this section:
(a) If the person convicted or adjudicated of violating this section
is eighteen years of age or younger and has one or more licenses or
permits issued under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act:
(i) For the first offense, the court may, as a part of the judgment
-74-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
of conviction or adjudication, (A) impound any such licenses or permits
for thirty days and (B) require such person to attend a drug education
class;
(ii) For a second offense, the court may, as a part of the judgment
of conviction or adjudication, (A) impound any such licenses or permits
for ninety days and (B) require such person to complete no fewer than
twenty and no more than forty hours of community service and to attend a
drug education class; and
(iii) For a third or subsequent offense, the court may, as a part of
the judgment of conviction or adjudication, (A) impound any such licenses
or permits for twelve months and (B) require such person to complete no
fewer than sixty hours of community service, to attend a drug education
class, and to submit to a drug assessment by a licensed alcohol and drug
counselor; and
(b) If the person convicted or adjudicated of violating this section
is eighteen years of age or younger and does not have a permit or license
issued under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act:
(i) For the first offense, the court may, as part of the judgment of
conviction or adjudication, (A) prohibit such person from obtaining any
permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such person would
otherwise be eligible until thirty days after the date of such order and
(B) require such person to attend a drug education class;
(ii) For a second offense, the court may, as part of the judgment of
conviction or adjudication, (A) prohibit such person from obtaining any
permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such person would
otherwise be eligible until ninety days after the date of such order and
(B) require such person to complete no fewer than twenty hours and no
more than forty hours of community service and to attend a drug education
class; and
(iii) For a third or subsequent offense, the court may, as part of
the judgment of conviction or adjudication, (A) prohibit such person from
-75-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
obtaining any permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such
person would otherwise be eligible until twelve months after the date of
such order and (B) require such person to complete no fewer than sixty
hours of community service, to attend a drug education class, and to
submit to a drug assessment by a licensed alcohol and drug counselor.
A copy of an abstract of the court's conviction or adjudication
shall be transmitted to the Director of Motor Vehicles pursuant to
sections 60-497.01 to 60-497.04 if a license or permit is impounded or a
juvenile is prohibited from obtaining a license or permit under this
subsection.
Sec. 169. Section 28-439, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-439 (1) As used in sections 28-101, 28-431, and 28-439 to 28-444,
unless the context otherwise requires, drug paraphernalia shall mean all
equipment, products, and materials of any kind which are used, intended
for use, or designed for use, in manufacturing, injecting, ingesting,
inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body a controlled
substance in violation of sections 28-101, 28-431, and 28-439 to 28-444
or the Uniform Controlled Substances Act. It shall include, but not be
limited to, the following:
(a) (1) Diluents and adulterants, such as quinine hydrochloride,
mannitol, mannite, dextrose, and lactose, used, intended for use, or
designed for use in cutting controlled substances;
(b) (2) Separation gins and sifters used, intended for use, or
designed for use in removing twigs and seeds from, or in otherwise
cleaning or refining, marijuana;
(c) (3) Hypodermic syringes, needles, and other objects used,
intended for use, and designed for use in parenterally injecting
controlled substances into the human body; and
(d) (4) Objects used, intended for use, or designed for use in
ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing marijuana, cocaine,
-76-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
hashish, or hashish oil into the human body, which shall include but not
be limited to the following:
(i) (a) Metal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or ceramic
pipes with or without screens, permanent screens, hashish heads, or
punctured metal bowls;
(ii) (b) Water pipes;
(iii) (c) Carburetion tubes and devices;
(iv) (d) Smoking and carburetion masks;
(v) (e) Roach clips, meaning objects used to hold burning material,
such as a marijuana cigarette, which has become too small or too short to
be held in the hand;
(vi) (f) Miniature cocaine spoons, and cocaine vials;
(vii) (g) Chamber pipes;
(viii) (h) Carburetor pipes;
(ix) (i) Electric pipes;
(x) (j) Air-driven pipes;
(xi) (k) Chillums;
(xii) (l) Bongs; and
(xiii) (m) Ice pipes or chillers.
(2) This section does not apply to conduct involving cannabis
accessories as defined in section 6 of this act when such conduct is
lawful under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act or the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
Sec. 170. Section 53-105, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-105 There is hereby created the Nebraska Liquor Control
Commission, consisting of three members to be appointed by the Governor,
subject to confirmation by a majority of the members elected to the
Legislature, no more than two of whom shall be members of the same
political party, and no two shall be citizens of the same congressional
district. The members of the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission shall
-77-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
also serve as members of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission as
provided in section 63 of this act.
Sec. 171. Section 53-106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-106 The Governor shall appoint three members of the commission,
one of whom the Governor he shall designate as chairperson chairman. One
member shall be appointed every two years and shall hold office for a
period of six years. Any appointee may be removed by the Governor, after
an opportunity to be heard, for malfeasance, misfeasance, or neglect in
office. No person shall be appointed to the commission, or continue to
hold that office after appointment, while holding any other office or
position under the laws of this state, any other state, or of the United
States, except that the commissioners shall also serve as members of the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission as provided in section 63 of this
act.
Sec. 172. Section 53-110, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-110 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Cannabis has the same meaning as in section 5 of this act;
(b) Commission means the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission and the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission;
(c) Conviction includes a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction
following a plea of nolo contendere, payment of a fine or penalty in
settlement of any prosecution, or forfeiture of a bond to appear in court
to answer charges; and
(d) Covered offense means:
(i) A felony; or
(ii) A violation of any federal or state law concerning the
manufacture or sale of alcoholic liquor or cannabis.
(2) (1) No person shall be appointed as a commissioner, the
executive director of the commission, or an employee of the commission
-78-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
who is not a citizen of the United States and who has not resided within
the State of Nebraska successively for two years next preceding the date
of his or her appointment.
(3) (2) No person (a) convicted of a covered offense or who has
pleaded guilty to a felony or any violation of any federal or state law
concerning the manufacture or sale of alcoholic liquor prior or
subsequent to the passage of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, (b) who has
paid a fine or penalty in settlement of any prosecution against him or
her for any violation of such laws, or (c) who has forfeited his or her
bond to appear in court to answer charges for any such violation shall be
appointed commissioner.
(4)(a) (3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of
this subsection, a no commissioner or employee of the commission shall
not may, directly or indirectly, individually, as a member of a
partnership, as a member of a limited liability company, or as a
shareholder of a corporation: , have
(i) Have any interest whatsoever in the manufacture, sale, or
distribution of alcoholic liquor or cannabis; ,
(ii) Receive receive any compensation or profit from such
manufacture, sale, or distribution; ,
(iii) Have or have any interest whatsoever in the purchases or sales
made by the persons authorized by the Nebraska Liquor Control Act act to
purchase or to sell alcoholic liquor; or .
(iv) Have any interest whatsoever in the purchases or sales made by
the persons authorized by the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or
the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act to purchase or to
sell cannabis.
(b) With the written approval of the executive director, an employee
of the commission, other than the executive director or a division
manager, may accept part-time or seasonal employment with a person
licensed or regulated by the commission. No such employment shall be
-79-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
approved if the licensee receives more than fifty percent of the
licensee's gross revenue from the sale or dispensing of alcoholic liquor
or cannabis.
(5) (4) This section shall not prevent any commissioner, the
executive director, or any employee from purchasing and keeping in his or
her possession for the use of himself, herself, or members of his or her
family or guests any:
(a) Alcoholic alcoholic liquor which may be purchased or kept by any
person pursuant to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act; or act.
(b) Cannabis which may be purchased or kept by any qualified patient
or registered caregiver pursuant to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act or the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act.
Sec. 173. Section 53-111, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-111 (1) A commissioner, the executive director of the commission,
or any person appointed or employed by the commission shall not solicit
or accept any gift, gratuity, emolument, or employment from any person
subject to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act or the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act or from any officer, agent, or employee thereof
or solicit, request from, or recommend, directly or indirectly, to any
such person or to any officer, agent, or employee thereof the appointment
of any person to any place or position. Any such person and every
officer, agent, or employee thereof may not offer to any commissioner,
the executive director, or any person appointed or employed by the
commission any gift, gratuity, emolument, or employment. If a
commissioner, the executive director, or any person appointed or employed
by the commission violates this section, he or she shall be removed from
his or her office or employment. Every person violating this section
shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.
Sec. 174. Section 60-6,211.08, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
-80-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
60-6,211.08 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Alcoholic beverage means (i) beer, ale, porter, stout, and other
similar fermented beverages, including sake or similar products, of any
name or description containing one-half of one percent or more of alcohol
by volume, brewed or produced from malt, wholly or in part, or from any
substitute therefor, (ii) wine of not less than one-half of one percent
of alcohol by volume, or (iii) distilled spirits which is that substance
known as ethyl alcohol, ethanol, or spirits of wine in any form,
including all dilutions and mixtures thereof from whatever source or by
whatever process produced. Alcoholic beverage does not include trace
amounts not readily consumable as a beverage;
(b) Cannabis has the same meaning as in section 5 of this act;
(c) (b) Highway means a road or street including the entire area
within the right-of-way;
(d) (c) Limousine means a luxury vehicle used to provide prearranged
passenger transportation on a dedicated basis at a premium fare that has
a seating capacity of at least five and no more than fourteen persons
behind the driver with a physical partition separating the driver seat
from the passenger compartment. Limousine does not include taxicabs,
hotel or airport buses or shuttles, or buses;
(e) (d) Open alcoholic beverage container, except as provided in
subsection (3) of section 53-123.04 and subdivision (1)(c) of section
53-123.11, means any bottle, can, or other receptacle:
(i) That contains any amount of alcoholic beverage or cannabis; and
(ii)(A) That is open or has a broken seal or (B) the contents of
which are partially removed; and
(f) (e) Passenger area means the area designed to seat the driver
and passengers while the motor vehicle is in operation and any area that
is readily accessible to the driver or a passenger while in their seating
positions, including any compartments in such area. Passenger area does
not include the area behind the last upright seat of such motor vehicle
-81-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
if the area is not normally occupied by the driver or a passenger and the
motor vehicle is not equipped with a trunk.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is unlawful for
any person in the passenger area of a motor vehicle to possess an open
alcoholic beverage container while the motor vehicle is located in a
public parking area or on any highway in this state.
(3) Except as provided in section 53-186 or subsection (4) of this
section, it is unlawful for any person to consume an alcoholic beverage
or cannabis (a) in a public parking area or on any highway in this state
or (b) inside a motor vehicle while in a public parking area or on any
highway in this state.
(4) This section does not apply to possession or consumption of
alcoholic beverages by persons who are passengers of, but not drivers of,
a limousine or bus being used in a charter or special party service as
defined by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Public
Service Commission and subject to Chapter 75, article 3. Such passengers
may possess open alcoholic beverage containers of alcoholic beverages and
may consume alcoholic beverages while such limousine or bus is in a
public parking area or on any highway in this state if (a) the driver of
the limousine or bus is prohibited from consuming alcoholic liquor and
(b) alcoholic liquor is not present in any area that is readily
accessible to the driver while in the driver's seat, including any
compartments in such area.
Sec. 175. Section 71-5727, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-5727 (1) Smoke or smoking means inhaling, exhaling, burning, or
carrying any lighted or heated:
(a) Cigar cigar, cigarette, pipe, hookah, or any other lighted or
heated tobacco or plant product intended for inhalation, whether natural
or synthetic, in any manner or in any form; or .
(b) Cannabis as defined in section 5 of this act.
-82-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(2) The term includes the use of an electronic smoking device or
similar device for cannabis which creates an aerosol or vapor, in any
manner or in any form.
Sec. 176. Section 77-2701.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
77-2701.02 Pursuant to section 77-2715.01:
(1) Until July 1, 1998, the rate of the sales tax levied pursuant to
section 77-2703 shall be five percent;
(2) Commencing July 1, 1998, and until July 1, 1999, the rate of the
sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be four and one-half
percent;
(3) Commencing July 1, 1999, and until the start of the first
calendar quarter after July 20, 2002, the rate of the sales tax levied
pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five percent;
(4) Commencing on the start of the first calendar quarter after July
20, 2002, and until July 1, 2023, the rate of the sales tax levied
pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five and one-half percent;
(5) Commencing July 1, 2023, and until July 1, 2024, the rate of the
sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five and one-half
percent, except that such rate shall be two and three-quarters percent on
transactions occurring within a good life district as defined in section
77-4403; and
(6) Commencing July 1, 2024, the rate of the sales tax levied
pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five and one-half percent, except
that such rate shall be:
(a) Two two and three-quarters percent on transactions that occur
within that portion of a good life district established pursuant to the
Good Life Transformational Projects Act which is located within the
corporate limits of a city or village; and .
(b) Four percent for sales of cannabis by dispensaries to qualified
patients and registered caregivers under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
-83-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Regulation Act.
Sec. 177. Section 77-2701.48, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2701.48 (1) Bundled transaction means the retail sale of two or
more products, except real property and services to real property, when
(a) the products are otherwise distinct and identifiable and (b) the
products are sold for one non-itemized price. Bundled transaction does
not include the sale of any products in which the sales price varies, or
is negotiable, based on the selection by the purchaser of the products
included in the transaction.
(2) Distinct and identifiable products do not include:
(a) Packaging, such as containers, boxes, sacks, bags, and bottles
or other materials such as wrapping, labels, tags, and instruction guides
that accompany the retail sale of the products and are incidental or
immaterial to the retail sale thereof. Examples of packaging that are
incidental or immaterial include grocery sacks, shoeboxes, dry cleaning
garment bags, and express delivery envelopes and boxes;
(b) A product provided free of charge with the required purchase of
another product. A product is provided free of charge if the sales price
of the product purchased does not vary depending on the inclusion of the
product provided free of charge; and
(c) Items included in the definition of sales price pursuant to
section 77-2701.35.
(3) One non-itemized price does not include a price that is
separately identified by product on binding sales or other supporting
sales-related documentation made available to the customer in paper or
electronic form, including, but not limited to, an invoice, bill of sale,
receipt, contract, service agreement, lease agreement, periodic notice of
rates and services, rate card, or price list.
(4) A transaction that otherwise meets the definition of a bundled
transaction is not a bundled transaction if it is (a) the retail sale of
-84-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
tangible personal property and a service where the tangible personal
property is essential to the use of the service, and is provided
exclusively in connection with the service, and the true object of the
transaction is the service, (b) the retail sale of services when one
service is provided that is essential to the use or receipt of a second
service and the first service is provided exclusively in connection with
the second service and the true object of the transaction is the second
service, or (c) a transaction that includes taxable products and
nontaxable products and the purchase price or sales price of the taxable
products is de minimus. De minimus means the seller's purchase price or
sales price of the taxable products is ten percent or less of the total
purchase price or sales price of the bundled products. Sellers shall use
either the purchase price or the sales price of the products to determine
if the taxable products are de minimus. Sellers may not use a combination
of the purchase price and sales price of the products to determine if the
taxable products are de minimus. Sellers shall use the full term of a
service contract to determine if the taxable products are de minimus.
(5) Bundled transaction does not include the retail sale of exempt
tangible personal property and taxable tangible personal property if (a)
the transaction includes food and food ingredients, drugs, durable
medical equipment, mobility enhancing equipment, over-the-counter drugs,
prosthetic devices, or medical supplies as such terms are defined in
section 77-2704.09 and (b) the seller's purchase price or sales price of
the taxable tangible personal property is fifty percent or less of the
total purchase price or sales price of the bundled tangible personal
property. Sellers may not use a combination of the purchase price and
sales price of the tangible personal property when making the fifty-
percent determination for a transaction.
Sec. 178. Section 77-2704.09, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.09 (1) Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross
-85-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or
other consumption in this state of (a) insulin, (b) mobility enhancing
equipment and drugs, not including over-the-counter drugs, when sold for
a patient's use under a prescription, and (c) the following when sold for
a patient's use under a prescription and which are of the type eligible
for coverage under the medical assistance program established pursuant to
the Medical Assistance Act: Durable medical equipment; home medical
supplies; prosthetic devices; oxygen; and oxygen equipment.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a)(i) (a) Drug means a compound, substance, preparation, and
component of a compound, substance, or preparation, other than food and
food ingredients, dietary supplements, or alcoholic beverages:
(A) (i) Recognized in the official United States Pharmacopoeia,
official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official
National Formulary, and any supplement to any of them;
(B) (ii) Intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease; or
(C) (iii) Intended to affect the structure or any function of the
body; and
(ii) Drug does not include cannabis obtained pursuant to the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act;
(b) Durable medical equipment means equipment which can withstand
repeated use, is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical
purpose, generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness or
injury, is appropriate for use in the home, and is not worn in or on the
body. Durable medical equipment includes repair and replacement parts for
such equipment;
(c) Home medical supplies means supplies primarily and customarily
used to serve a medical purpose which are appropriate for use in the home
and are generally not useful to a person in the absence of illness or
injury;
-86-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
(d) Mobility enhancing equipment means equipment which is primarily
and customarily used to provide or increase the ability to move from one
place to another, which is not generally used by persons with normal
mobility, and which is appropriate for use either in a home or a motor
vehicle. Mobility enhancing equipment includes repair and replacement
parts for such equipment. Mobility enhancing equipment does not include
any motor vehicle or equipment on a motor vehicle normally provided by a
motor vehicle manufacturer;
(e) Over-the-counter drug means a drug that contains a label that
identifies the product as a drug as required by 21 C.F.R. 201.66, as such
regulation existed on January 1, 2003. The over-the-counter drug label
includes a drug facts panel or a statement of the active ingredients with
a list of those ingredients contained in the compound, substance, or
preparation;
(f) Oxygen equipment means oxygen cylinders, cylinder transport
devices including sheaths and carts, cylinder studs and support devices,
regulators, flowmeters, tank wrenches, oxygen concentrators, liquid
oxygen base dispensers, liquid oxygen portable dispensers, oxygen tubing,
nasal cannulas, face masks, oxygen humidifiers, and oxygen fittings and
accessories;
(g) Prescription means an order, formula, or recipe issued in any
form of oral, written, electronic, or other means of transmission by a
duly licensed practitioner authorized under the Uniform Credentialing
Act; and
(h) Prosthetic devices means a replacement, corrective, or
supportive device worn on or in the body to artificially replace a
missing portion of the body, prevent or correct physical deformity or
malfunction, or support a weak or deformed portion of the body, and
includes any supplies used with such device and repair and replacement
parts.
Sec. 179. Section 77-27,132, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-87-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
77-27,132 (1) There is hereby created a fund to be designated the
Revenue Distribution Fund which shall be set apart and maintained by the
Tax Commissioner. Revenue not required to be credited to the General Fund
or any other specified fund may be credited to the Revenue Distribution
Fund. Credits and refunds of such revenue shall be paid from the Revenue
Distribution Fund. The balance of the amount credited, after credits and
refunds, shall be allocated as provided by the statutes creating such
revenue.
(2) The Tax Commissioner shall pay to a depository bank designated
by the State Treasurer all amounts collected under the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967. The Tax Commissioner shall present to the State Treasurer
bank receipts showing amounts so deposited in the bank, and of the
amounts so deposited the State Treasurer shall:
(a)(i) For transactions occurring on or after October 1, 2014, and
before July 1, 2024, credit to the Game and Parks Commission Capital
Maintenance Fund all of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed
pursuant to section 77-2703 on the sale or lease of motorboats as defined
in section 37-1204, personal watercraft as defined in section 37-1204.01,
all-terrain vehicles as defined in section 60-103, and utility-type
vehicles as defined in section 60-135.01; and
(ii) For transactions occurring on or after July 1, 2024, credit to
the Game and Parks Commission Capital Maintenance Fund all of the
proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed pursuant to section 77-2703
on the sale or lease of motorboats as defined in section 37-1204,
personal watercraft as defined in section 37-1204.01, all-terrain
vehicles as defined in section 60-103, and utility-type vehicles as
defined in section 60-135.01, and from such proceeds, transfers shall be
made to the Nebraska Emergency Medical System Operations Fund as provided
in section 37-327.02;
(b) Credit to the Highway Trust Fund all of the proceeds of the
-88-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
sales and use taxes derived from the sale or lease for periods of more
than thirty-one days of motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers,
except that the proceeds equal to any sales tax rate provided for in
section 77-2701.02 that is in excess of five percent derived from the
sale or lease for periods of more than thirty-one days of motor vehicles,
trailers, and semitrailers shall be credited to the Highway Allocation
Fund;
(c) For transactions occurring on or after July 1, 2013, and before
July 1, 2042, of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes derived from
transactions other than those listed in subdivisions (2)(a), (b), and
(e), and (f) of this section from a sales tax rate of one-quarter of one
percent, credit monthly eighty-five percent to the Highway Trust Fund and
fifteen percent to the Highway Allocation Fund;
(d) Of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes derived from
transactions other than those listed in subdivisions (2)(a), (b), and
(e), and (f) of this section, credit to the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund
the amount certified under section 77-27,237, if any such certification
is made; and
(e) For transactions occurring on or after July 1, 2023, credit to
the Department of Transportation Aeronautics Capital Improvement Fund all
of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed pursuant to section
77-2703 on the sale or lease of aircraft as defined in section 3-101;
and .
(f) Credit to the School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund
all of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed pursuant to
section 77-2703 on the sale of cannabis by dispensaries to qualified
patients and registered caregivers under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis
Regulation Act.
The balance of all amounts collected under the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967 shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 180. Section 77-4303, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-89-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
amended to read:
77-4303 (1) A tax is hereby imposed on marijuana and controlled
substances at the following rates:
(a) On each ounce of marijuana or each portion of an ounce, one
hundred dollars;
(b) On each gram or portion of a gram of a controlled substance that
is customarily sold by weight or volume, one hundred fifty dollars; or
(c) On each fifty dosage units or portion thereof of a controlled
substance that is not customarily sold by weight, five hundred dollars.
(2) For purposes of calculating the tax under this section,
marijuana or any controlled substance that is customarily sold by weight
or volume shall be measured by the weight of the substance in the
dealer's possession. The weight shall be the actual weight, if known, or
the estimated weight as determined by the Nebraska State Patrol or other
law enforcement agency. Such determination shall be presumed to be the
weight of such marijuana or controlled substances for purposes of
sections 77-4301 to 77-4316.
(3) The tax shall not be imposed upon a person registered or
otherwise lawfully in possession of marijuana or a controlled substance
pursuant to Chapter 28, article 4, or lawfully in possession of cannabis
under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act or the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
Sec. 181. Section 81-2,239, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2,239 Sections 81-2,239 to 81-2,292 and section 183 of this act
and the provisions of the Food Code and the Current Good Manufacturing
Practice In Manufacturing, Packing, or Holding Human Food adopted by
reference in sections 81-2,257.01 and 81-2,259, shall be known and may be
cited as the Nebraska Pure Food Act.
Sec. 182. Section 81-2,263, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-90-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
81-2,263 If there is an inconsistency between sections 81-2,239 to
81-2,292 and section 183 of this act and any code adopted by reference,
the requirements of the sections shall control.
Sec. 183. Edible cannabis products sold under the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act are subject to the Nebraska Pure Food Act to the
same extent as other items of food.
Sec. 184. Section 81-1021, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1021 (1) All motor vehicles acquired by the State of Nebraska
except any vehicle rented as a bureau fleet vehicle shall be indelibly
and conspicuously lettered, in plain letters of a contrasting color or
reflective material:
(a) On each side thereof with the words State of Nebraska and
following such words the name of whatever board, department, bureau,
division, institution, including the University of Nebraska or state
college, office, or other state expending agency of the state to which
the motor vehicle belongs; and
(b) On the back thereof with the words State of Nebraska.
(2) This section shall not apply to motor vehicles used or
controlled by:
(a) The Nebraska State Patrol, the Public Service Commission, the
Game and Parks Commission, deputy state sheriffs employed by the Nebraska
Brand Committee and State Fire Marshal for state law enforcement
purposes, inspectors employed by the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission
or the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission, and persons employed by the
Tax Commissioner for state revenue enforcement purposes, the exemption
for state law enforcement purposes and state revenue enforcement purposes
being confined strictly to the seven agencies specifically named;
(b) The Department of Health and Human Services or the Department of
Correctional Services for the purpose of apprehending and returning
escaped offenders or parole violators to facilities in the Department of
-91-

LB677 LB677
2025 2025
Correctional Services and transporting offenders and personnel of the
Department of Correctional Services and patients and personnel of the
Department of Health and Human Services who are engaged in off-campus
program activities;
(c) The Military Department;
(d) Vocational rehabilitation counselors and the Department of
Health and Human Services for the purposes of communicable disease
control, for the prevention and control of those communicable diseases
which endanger the public health, or used by the Department of Health and
Human Services in the enforcement of drug control laws or for other
investigation purposes;
(e) The Department of Agriculture for special investigative
purposes;
(f) The Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board for
investigative purposes;
(g) The Insurance Fraud Prevention Division of the Department of
Insurance for investigative purposes; and
(h) The Department of Justice.
Sec. 185. Original sections 28-439, 53-105, 53-106, 53-110, 53-111,
60-6,211.08, 77-2701.48, 77-2704.09, 77-4303, 81-2,239, 81-2,263, and
81-1021, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, sections 28-416, 71-5727,
77-2701.02, and 77-27,132, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
and sections 1, 3, 4, and 5, Initiative Law 2024, No. 438, are repealed.
Sec. 186. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
28-463, 28-464, 28-465, 28-466, 28-467, 28-468, and 28-469, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 2 and 6, Initiative Law 2024,
No. 438.
Sec. 187. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-92-